


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.15
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.01
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.87%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/21/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.87%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 03:07:02 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund





















404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                












Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now














































JPMorgan Total Return Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan Total Return Fund(JMTAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewPerformanceFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
  




Designed ToDesigned to deliver high total return through investing in a wide range of debt securities.ApproachUtilizes a dynamic approach that combines traditional fixed income with opportunistic investingEmploys a top-down, macro-driven approach to help mitigate risks of benchmark-constrained strategiesSelects investments by analyzing the performance potential of individual securities and different market sectors










Overview widget loading ...







Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William  Eigen Portfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: Total Return (A)




Commentary: Total Return







Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - Total Return Fund




Supplemental Data Sheet - Total Return Fund


Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan Total Return Fund







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 




Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 0.66% for A Shares, 1.31% for C Shares, 0.56% for I Shares, 1.16% for R2 Shares, 0.46% for R5 Shares and 0.41% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 6/30/2017 for A Shares, 6/30/2017 for C Shares, 6/30/2017 for I Shares, 6/30/2017 for R2 Shares, 6/30/2017 for R5 Shares and 6/30/2017 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index is an unmanaged index representing SEC-registered taxable and dollar denominated securities. It covers the U.S. investment grade fixed rate bond market, with index components for government and corporate securities, mortgage pass-through, and asset-backed securities. The performance of the Lipper Core Plus Bond Funds Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. The value of investments in mortgage-related and asset-backed securities will be influenced by the factors affecting the housing market and the assets underlying such securities. The securities may decline in value, face valuation difficulties, become more volatile and/or become illiquid. They are also subject to prepayment risk, which occurs when mortgage holders refinance or otherwise repay their loans sooner than expected, creating an early return of principal to holders of the loans. The Fund may use futures contracts, swaps, and derivatives in connection with its investment strategies. Derivatives are subject to the risk that changes in the value of a derivative may not correlate perfectly with the underlying asset, rate or index.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 

















Principle #1: Plan on Living a Long Time - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar








PRINCIPLE #1: PLAN ON LIVING A LONG TIME

DON’T LET YOUR CLIENTS' MONEY RUN OUT

Your clients are living longer, and many of them haven't saved enough. Use our Principles for Successful Long-Term Investing to talk to them about this reality, and to help them be prepared.
ACCESS ALL 7 PRINCIPLES







 














We are living longer

Thanks to advances in medicine and healthier lifestyles, people who are 65 today have a very good chance of reaching ages 80 or 90. A 65-year-old couple might be surprised to learn that at least one of them has a 48% probability of living another 25 years and needing investments to last until age 90.

	 

Many of us have not saved enough

Studies reveal that individuals do not feel adequately prepared for retirement. Investors should start early by saving more, investing with discipline and having a plan for their future.

	 

	 

Explore More Principles

Learn more about successful long-term investing
   NEXT PRINCIPLE   >   






4 STRATEGIES FOR LONG-TERM INVESTORS

We offer investment strategies covering all asset classes for diversification and risk management to help you and your clients build stronger portfolios.
ACCESS 4 HIGH CONVICTION FUNDS



Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.



















Tools & Resources - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Tools & Resources
			
Email ThisPrint




Target Date CompassSM



	An industry-leading target date fund evaluation tool, Target Date CompassSM, was the first of its kind to use a standardized, systematic process for evaluating and selecting target date funds.


USE TARGET DATE COMPASS 




Morningstar® Tools

Hypothetical Illustrations 
                         


	You can simulate a hypothetical experience of a portfolio over a specific past timeframe using actual performance data for an individual fund or portfolio of funds.


Hypothetical Tool 





Multi-Fund Comparisons
                         


	Compare multiple securities in terms of performance, portfolio, operations, and risk data. You can also generate a FINRA-reviewed Multiple Fund Comparison report. 


Compare Funds 





Portfolio Analysis
                         


	Analyze existing client portfolios based on current available Morningstar® data, or view aggregate statistics for a set of chosen investments.


Analyze portfolio 








Insights app
                         


	Make the complex clearer for your clients. This app is a powerful way for advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan's Insights for their clients.


Get the Insights App






Additional  Tools & Resources




Shareholder Account Access 
                         

                            Our site provides a powerful way to access your account with J.P. Morgan Funds.

	We hope you find it easy to use and full of helpful features.


LOG IN OR REGISTER NOW 




Shareholder Account Resources
                         



Shareholder Account Resources  
Tax Planning Information Documents  
Money Market Reform resources  







TARGET DATE FUNDS. Target date funds are funds with the target date being the approximate date when investors plan to start withdrawing their money. Generally, the asset allocation of each fund will change on an annual basis with the asset allocation becoming more conservative as the fund nears the target retirement date. The principal value of the fund(s) is not guaranteed at any time, including at the target date.

	*TDFs may suffer investment losses, including near and following retirement. There is no guarantee that a TDF will provide adequate retirement income.
	 

1 PLANADVISER magazine 2016 Retirement Plan Advisor Survey.

2 Morningstar, Inc. Trailing 5-Year period. Based on rankings for the R6 share class of each fund versus their relevant Morningstar target date category as of 12/31/16. Different share classes may have different rankings.

3 Chatham Partners Satisfaction Survey, 2015 J.P. Morgan Asset Management is the marketing name for the asset management business of JPMorgan Chase & Co., and its affiliates worldwide.

	Contact JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc. at 1-800-480-4111 for a prospectus. Carefully consider the fund's objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the mutual fund before investing. The prospectus contains this and other fund information. Read it carefully before investing.

	J.P. Morgan Funds are distributed by JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc., which is an affiliate of JPMorgan Chase & Co. Affiliates of JPMorgan Chase & Co. receive fees for providing various services to the funds. JPMorgan Distribution Services, Inc. is a member of FINRA/SIPC.





 





FLC | Total Return Fund | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated
















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










FLC - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund
Common Shares



DAILY DATA as of 7/20/17




Closing Market Price
22.24


Current Distribution Rate
7.18%


Monthly Dividend Per Share
0.133


Ex-Dividend Date
07-20-17


Payable Date
07-31-17


Daily Volume
22,347


52 Week High/Low Market Price
22.45 / 18.55


52 Week High/Low NAV
21.90 / 19.75


Intraday Trading Information
NYSE






WEEKLY DATA as of 7/14/17




Closing Market Price
22.45


Closing NAV
21.90


Closing Volume
54,275


Premium/(Discount)
2.51%


Distribution Rate
7.11%


Net Assets
$218,082,477.60


Common Shares Outstanding
9,958,104


Percent Leveraged1
32.5%


52-Week Average Premium/Discount
1.51%





ANNUAL DATA AS OF 11/30/16



Fiscal Year End
11/30


Portfolio Manager
Flaherty & Crumrine


Shareholder Servicing Agent
Destra Capital


Expense Ratio (Common Shares)2
1.30%


Portfolio Turnover Rate
14%


1 As a percentage of total assets. This figure is calculated on a weekly basis.
2 Annualized, excluding interest expense associated with the Fund’s financial leverage strategy for the fiscal year ended November 30, 2016.
Inception Information


Common Shares



Inception Date
August 26, 2003


NYSE Symbol
FLC


NAV Symbol
XFLCX


The Wall Street Journal Listing
FlrtyClayTotRet


CUSIP
338479108


Inception Market Price
$25.00


Inception NAV
$23.88






FINANCIAL LEVERAGE as of 7/14/17




Leverage Outstanding
$104,800,000.00


1940 Act Asset Coverage Ratio
308.1%



Monthly Total Returns
as of 6/30/17


 Market PriceNAV



YTD
16.55%
13.51%


1 Year
9.99%
15.56%


3 Year
12.30%
9.70%


5 Year
11.76%
11.96%


10 Year
11.09%
9.36%


Since Inception (8/29/03)
8.59%
8.24%


Performance data quoted represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results, and current performance may be lower or higher than the figures shown. Since Inception returns assume a purchase of common shares at the initial offering price of $25.00 per share for market price returns or initial net asset value (NAV) of $23.88 per share for NAV returns. Returns for periods of less than one year are not annualized. All distributions are assumed to be reinvested either in accordance with the Dividend Reinvestment Plan (DRIP) for market price returns or NAV for NAV returns. Until the DRIP price is available from the Plan Agent, the market price returns reflect the reinvestment at the closing market price on the last business day of the month. Once the DRIP is available around mid-month, the market price returns are updated to reflect reinvestment at the DRIP price.Investment Objective and Strategies
The Fund’s investment objective is high current income for holders of its common stock.  Under normal market conditions, the Fund invests at least 50% of its “Managed Assets” in a portfolio of preferred securities issued by U.S. and non-U.S. companies, including traditional preferred stock, trust preferred securities, and hybrid securities that have characteristics of both equity and debt securities.
General Investment Guidelines of the Fund:

at least 50% of its Managed Assets in a portfolio of preferred securities issued by U.S. and non-U.S. companies
more than 25% of its Managed Assets in the financials sector
at least 90% of its Managed Assets in (i) investment grade quality securities or (ii) below investment grade quality preferred or subordinated securities of companies with investment grade senior unsecured debt outstanding, in either case determined at the time of purchase
“Managed Assets” are the Fund’s net assets, plus the principal amount of loans from financial institutions or debt securities issued by the Fund, the liquidation preference of preferred shares issued by the Fund, if any, and the proceeds of any reverse repurchase agreements entered into by the Fund.

Leverage
The Fund seeks to enhance the level of its distributions and total return the use of leverage.  The Fund may utilize economic leverage through borrowing, including loans from certain financial institutions and/or the issuance of debt securities, preferred shares and reverse repurchase agreements in an amount, determined at the time of issuance of such leverage, up to 33 1/3% of its managed assets.  The Fund currently borrows money under a credit facility and the dollar balance and percentage amounts of financial leverage of the Fund outstanding as of any particular date are detailed above under “Financial Leverage.”
The use of leverage can create special risks and there can be no assurance a leveraging strategy will be successful during any period in which it is employed. “See Leverage Risk.”FLC Fund Manager
The preferred securities market is a complex one for the individual investor or average investment advisor to effectively navigate. Flaherty & Crumrine was formed in 1983 with the express intention of managing portfolios of preferred securities for institutional investors. The firm has experience dating back to 1991 in managing leveraged and hedged preferred securities funds. Through its experience in the preferred securities markets, Flaherty & Crumrine has developed the expertise necessary to implement the portfolio and interest rate management strategies necessary in seeking to obtain the highest sustainable income.
Focus... The preferred market is a relatively small and often overlooked segment of the capital markets. It has been the focus of Flaherty & Crumrine's principals for over 30 years, enabling them to find and exploit numerous opportunities in this wonderfully inefficient market.
Philosophy... Flaherty & Crumrine feels that the best way to achieve consistently superior investment results is a combination of intensive credit research and quantitative analysis, along with some very pragmatic trading strategies. We have been described as "a curious blend of mad scientist and horse trader.” However, we do not believe in strategies which require heroic bets on individual credits or on the direction of interest rates.
Independence... Flaherty & Crumrine is an independent firm, not affiliated with any brokerage or other securities firm. This independence allows them the flexibility to serve their clients, and keeps their focus on managing preferred portfolios. Their clients' assets are held by an independent custodian of their choosing, typically a bank or trust company.
As a matter of philosophy, Flaherty & Crumrine operates with a very compact staff of highly qualified professionals, all of whom share in the profits of the firm. This approach is designed to encourage the focus on their specialized investment niche and to avoid having the attention of their key people diverted.Investment Team


R. Eric Chadwick, CFA | Portfolio Manager and President

1/99 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


1/97 - 12/98
Koch Industries, Inc.


 
Portfolio Manager/Financial Associate


5/96 - 8/96
J.C. Penney


 
Supervisor – Internship


University of Kansas – B.S. Business, 1996 (Honor Roll)


Anderson School of Business University of California, Los Angeles – M.B.A., 2003





Chad Conwell | Executive Vice President, Chief Legal Officer and Chief Compliance Officer

7/05 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


9/98 - 6/05
Paul, Hastings, Janofsky & Walker, LLP


 
Attorney


University of California at Berkeley - B.A. Political Science, 1993 (With distinction)


Georgetown University Law Center, Washington, D.C. - J.D., 1998 (Cum laude)
 





Bradford S. Stone | Portfolio Manager, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer

5/03 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


6/01 - 5/03
Barclays Capital


 
Director, US Market Strategy


2/87 - 6/01
Goldman, Sachs & Company


 
Vice President, Interest Rate Strategy


 
Executive Director, Global Hedge Fund Sales


8/83 - 2/87
Salomon Brothers Inc.


 
Vice President, Government & Derivatives Sales


 
Associate, Options Trading Hedge Fund Sales


Dartmouth College – A.B. Economics, 1981


The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania - M.B.A., 1983 (With Distinction, Director’s Honor List)





Rick J. Seto, CFA | Managing Director

10/03 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


10/99 - 10/03
UBS Investment Bank


 
Associate Analyst (Equity Research)


 
Natural Gas & Electric Utilities, MLPs


10/96 - 10/99
Moody's Investors Service


 
Associate Analyst, Investment Grade - Consumer Products and Retail Companies


12/91 - 10/96
Fleet Bank, N.A. (formerly NatWest Bank, N.A.)


 
Assistant Vice President, Commercial Lending Officer


 
Assistant Treasurer, Diversified Industries and Corporate Finance Group


 
Financial Analyst, Asset-Based Lending


New York University, B.S. Statistics and Econometrics, 1989


NatWest Bank, N.A., Formal Credit Training Program, 1994-95
 





Lisa C. Tucci, CFA | Managing Director

3/05 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


11/00 - 3/05
UBS Investment Bank


 
Associate Director (Equity Research) - Natural Gas & Electric Utilities


State University at Albany, New York, B.S., 2000 (With Honors)





Gordon Russo | Senior Credit Analyst

12/12 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


12/00 - 5/05
Dwight Asset Management


 
Senior Vice President


 
Insurance and Healthcare


8/92 - 5/00
Sandler O'Neill and Partners, L.P.


 
Managing Director


11/89 - 8/92
U.S. Department of the Treasury


 
Office of Thrift Supervision


 
Bank Examiner / Supervisory Analyst


2/85 - 5/89
Bank of New England


 
Corporation Corporate Accountant


Bently College Graduate School, Masters of Science in Finance (MSF), 1989


Rutgers College, B.A. Economics with Accounting Concentration, 1985





Roger W. Ko | Trader

9/13 - Present
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


8/04 - 7/13
Deutsche Bank Securities, Inc (Trader)


University of Michigan Law School - J.D., 2003


Haverford College - B.S. Chemistry, 1996 (Honors)


Frequently Asked Question
Preferred Securities
What is a preferred security?
A preferred security is a creature of both equity and debt. It ranks in between a bond and common stock in a company’s capital structure, typically is either perpetual or has a very long maturity and, yet, it pays dividend or interest amounts which may be fixed or floating according to the terms of the issue and it does not directly participate in the growth or profitability of the company.
Because of these equity features and its longer duration, a preferred security will yield higher than a bond of the same issuer. In fact, because of the generally higher credit quality of preferred securities issuers, preferred securities are generally the highest-yielding securities of investment-grade companies.
What are the income characteristics of preferred securities?
Preferred securities pay dividends or interest at either a fixed-rate or a variable rate determined either by formula or through a Dutch auction process. Because of the ranking of preferred securities, an issuer may not pay income to its common shareholders without first paying all its current obligations to holders of its preferred securities. In some circumstances, the issuer may, however, pay its debt holders without paying anything to its preferred holders.
Dividends and interest payments can be either cumulative or non-cumulative. If cumulative, all dividends or interest payments that have not been paid will accumulate and must be paid before holders of common stock receive any dividends. If non-cumulative, the company may elect not to pay a particular periodic dividend to preferred holders without any further obligation to repay that dividend.
In certain instances, failure to pay preferred dividends may entitle preferred shareholders to representation on the company’s board of directors.
What are the credit characteristics of preferred securities?
In the event of liquidation, preferred shareholders must be paid all dividends and principal before distributions may be made to common shareholders. Many preferred securities are listed on major stock exchanges, and specialized trading departments of several investment brokerage firms further enhance liquidity.
Some preferred securities may be convertible into the common stock of the issuing corporation.
Returns from investment grade preferred securities correlate much more closely with investment grade bonds and U.S. Treasury securities than with common stocks or "junk" bonds.
What are the differences between traditional preferreds and hybrid preferreds?
It is all basically a matter of taxes. In other respects, the two are really very similar. Traditional preferreds are treated for tax purposes just like any other equity security such as common stock. The issuer receives no deduction for tax purposes for dividend payments made to holders of preferred shares. On the other hand, those dividends are 70% tax free to corporate investors due to the Dividend Received Deduction ("DRD"). The purpose of the DRD is to eliminate in part the double taxation of these dollars at the corporate level that would otherwise occur. Additionally, these securities generally classify as qualified dividend income (QDI) to individual investors. QDI is currently taxed at 15% for most individual investors and a rate of 20% for very high income investors.
Hybrid preferreds were created in the mid-1990s for the purpose of allowing issuers to get a deduction for dividend payments on preferreds, just like they deduct interest payments on debt securities. Since no tax is paid by the issuer, there is no double tax to avoid and no DRD available to a corporate holder of hybrids. Initially, hybrids were primarily purchased by individual investors, but the market has now broadened to include institutions as well. The distributions from hybrid securities are classified as interest, and as such, they are taxed as ordinary income to the individual investor. Please contact your tax advisor for further discussion on this matter as neither Flaherty & Crumrine nor Destra Capital provides tax advice
What are a few advantages of utilizing institutional preferred securities?
The advantages to having access to both the institutional and retail preferred markets are evident in the current environment, particularly when comparing the preferred securities exchange-traded fund (“ETFs”) vs the Flaherty & Crumrine preferred securities closed-end funds. Generally, ETFs are limited to only listed preferred securities (typically on the NYSE), which constitute only about 50% of the total preferred securities market. The balance of the preferred market trades over-the-counter, a market that is generally unavailable to retail investors. The issues in this institutional market generally have better call protection and trade at higher yields.
Distributions
How does leverage impact the amount of the Fund’s distribution
The Fund uses leverage to enhance returns to common shareholders. Most of the time, the Fund is able to borrow money at rates well below rates it can earn on the investment portfolio. Of course, the benefit of leverage is greatest when the "spread" between income generated by the portfolio and cost of leverage is wide. However, the converse is also true; leverage doesn't provide as much income when the spread is narrow and may increase volatility of the common shares
Can the Fund's hedging strategy impact the amount of the Fund’s distribution?
The hedging strategy that may be employed by the Fund is designed to:

Protect the Fund's net asset value from significant increases in long-term U.S. Treasury rates which occur over a short period of time; and
Enable the Fund's distribution rate to increase if long-term U.S. Treasury rates increase significantly over a short period of time.

The mechanism is pretty straightforward - if long-terms rates rise significantly, the hedging instruments used by the Fund should under normal market conditions increase in value. This increase offsets some of the decline in the value of the Fund's investment portfolio (protecting the Fund's NAV) and produces gains which can be used by the Fund to purchase additional income-producing securities. Please note that on a temporary or extended basis, the Adviser may determine that hedging Fund holdings is not likely to produce these results. If it does, the Adviser may not utilize any hedging strategy for the Fund or may limit hedging to a large extent, and the above results would not occur. Consequently, the Fund could have less protection of NAV and could generate less income than if the hedging strategies had been used.
There is an expense associated with hedging, however. The Fund has to pay for its hedging instruments, and it only collects on the hedging strategy if long-term U.S. Treasury rates rise significantly. If rates do not rise significantly, then the Fund will lose the amount it paid for the hedging instrument without receiving any benefit. That being said, generally it is better to have the hedge in place and not need it than to need it and not have it. However, the Fund may not hedge the interest rate exposure of the portfolio if the Adviser believes that the cost of hedging outweighs the likely benefits of it. Similarly, when viewed historically, if it turns out that the cost of hedging did outweigh the benefits (either because long-term U.S. Treasury rates did not rise significantly or because the hedging instruments the Fund employed did not perform as expected), the Fund will have paid for a hedging strategy it ultimately did not need.
In addition, the cost of these hedging instruments are a function of many things, but a key factor is the differential between short- and long-term interest rates. As a general rule, when this differential is large, the cost of hedging is high.
How does the Fund balance the factors that affect the Fund’s distribution?
Income, leverage cost and hedging cost create a three-legged distribution stool, and each leg can move up or down for different or similar reasons. Trying to forecast changes in one leg is difficult enough, let alone three. Consequently, projecting a distribution amount is a mixture of art and science, and becomes more difficult the further out in time we look.
Having said that, we can make some general observations about how the legs of the stool relate to one another. We already noted that falling long-term interest rates and rising short-term interest rates tend to lower income. At the same time, a flatter yield curve (i.e. a smaller difference between long and short rates) lowers the cost of hedging, potentially improving returns going forward. Conversely, rising long-term and short-term interest rates tend to increase income and, at the same time, increase the cost of the Fund's leverage. Whether the cost of hedging changes depends on how long-term and short-term interest rates move relative to each other. Although far from perfect, over the longer term there is some degree of balance among the three legs of the stool.
Nonetheless, over the shorter term, interest rate changes can adversely or positively impact the income a Fund receives and the cost of its leverage and hedging, and shareholders should consider these changes and their impact on the net income generated by that Fund and consequently the size of the distribution it is able to pay.
How does the Fund produce income?
The Fund invests in a portfolio of income producing securities consistent with its objectives and guidelines. The Fund's strategy is pretty straightforward - maximize income over the long term, while not exposing the Fund's net asset value to unnecessary risk. Over the long run, income generated by a Fund's securities portfolio will be influenced primarily by two things - the level of long-term interest rates (typically measured by the yield on 30 year U.S. Treasury bonds) and the relationship of yields on the preferred securities held by the Fund to those long-term interest rates.
How will the Fund report the breakdown between distributions and interest?
The Fund will calculate the breakdown between Qualified Dividend Income (QDI) and interest and report it to shareholders on Form 1099. We will also publish the breakdown on the Fund's website and in the Annual Report to Shareholders.
Can I reinvest distributions directly into the Fund and is there any benefit over purchasing shares in the open market?
The answer to both questions is yes. The Fund's Dividend Reinvestment Plan (the "DRIP") provides a means of acquiring additional shares of the Fund without paying the full market premium, if any. When the market price is above NAV, new shares will be issued to participants in the Plan at the higher of NAV or 95% of the then current market price. Participating shareholders can therefore receive a discount on their reinvested shares of up to 5% of the market price. If the market price of the shares is below the NAV, the Plan purchases shares in the open market. The brokerage commission charged for acquiring these shares is competitive with most "discount" brokers. Shareholders should be aware that not all broker-dealers participate in the Fund's Dividend Reinvestment Plan. If your shares are held in a brokerage account, ask your broker if his/her firm is set up to participate. If you hold your shares in certificate form, or if you would just like more information, call BNY Mellon Investment Servicing (US) Inc., at 1-866-351-7446.
What does "Ex-Div"refer to?
Every month the Funds pay distributions, and the value of the distribution is subtracted from the Funds' NAVs on the Ex-Dividend date each month. So when the NAVs are reported with an "Ex-Div" behind them, it means that the amount of the distribution has been taken out of the Net Asset Value.
Hedging and Leverage
Does the Fund currently employ a hedging strategy?
As a result of the credit crunch that began in July 2007, there has been a lower correlation between changes in the value of preferred securities and the put options on Treasury bond futures that the Fund would normally use to hedge its preferred securities. Preferred securities have tended to trade more based on credit quality than on changes in interest rates as expressed in Treasury bond rates. At the same time, the cost of hedging has increased as short-term interest rates have dropped substantially below long-term rates and interest-rate volatility has increased. As a result, the Fund does not currently use any instruments to hedge against significant increases in long-term interest rates. The Fund continues to evaluate the potential benefits and costs of hedging . At any particular time, all, none or some portion of the Fund’s holdings may be hedged.
What are interest rate swaps and swaptions?
Although their name sounds rather strange, interest rate swaps are one of the most widely used forms of derivative contracts. A swaption is simply an option to enter into an interest rate swap on pre-determined terms if that turns out to be attractive to do before the option expires. Similar to the put options on Treasury bond futures contracts that the Fund may purchase as hedges, the entire price paid for the swaption is at risk. However, that is the most that a purchaser of a swaption can lose on the contract. For this reason, swaptions are probably more interesting to the Fund than swaps.
At the risk of oversimplification, this is the essence of an interest rate swap between two parties. Party A makes a "loan" to Party B at an interest rate that is fixed for the life of the swap. Party B makes a "loan" to Party A for the identical amount and life at an interest rate that will be variable based on a market indicator of short-term interest rates, which is often LIBOR (the London Interbank Offer Rate). Since the amounts of the "loans" offset each other, the only cash that actually changes hands is the difference between the fixed and variable interest rates, which will fluctuate over the life of the swap as the variable interest rate changes.
The structure of interest rate swaps, although it may seem somewhat contorted, makes them very useful in a wide range of hedging situations. The market value of existing interest rate swaps will reflect swings in general interest rates in a reasonably systematic way, which will, depending on how things turn out, be good for one of the parties to a swap and bad for the other. In this respect, swaps resemble options-based hedges, but they also differ since they are not tied specifically to interest rates on Treasury bonds. At any point in time, they may or may not track preferred stocks closely given the often-observed idiosyncrasies of the preferred market.
There are various other risks of derivatives involved in interest rate swaps and swaptions. Even though major financial and broker/dealer organizations are the usual counterparties, anyone entering into such an agreement must carefully consider the other party's credit worthiness and its ability to perform its obligations. Market liquidity may also be a risk at certain times. Furthermore, legal and operational risks may be a reason to avoid more exotic derivative contracts. As is the case with option-based hedges, interest rate swaps and swaptions can involve significant economic leverage that could cause relatively small changes in interest rates to produce disproportionally large swings in the market value of the swaps or swaptions and a significant risk of loss.
Other Topics
How can investors purchase shares of Common Stock of the Fund?
The Fund’s shares trade on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the symbol “FLC”. As with any other companies listed on the NYSE, investors can purchase or sell shares of Common Stock of the Fund during normal business hours of the NYSE through a registered broker-dealer.
How much experience does the manager have with managing preferred securities?
Managing preferred portfolios has been the specialty of Flaherty & Crumrine since its inception in 1983 (and the experience of the portfolio managers goes back well beyond that at their prior employer). Flaherty & Crumrine has been managing similarly structured hedged and leveraged closed-end preferred funds since 1991.
Why does the Fund trade at premiums or discounts to NAV?
FLC is a closed-end investment company. Closed-end funds have inherent advantages over traditional mutual funds (or “open-end funds”). For example, a closed-end fund like FLC can use leverage and as a fixed pool, it can fully allocate its assets to higher yielding securities without regard to volatile inflows and outflows associated with shareholder purchases and redemptions that may occur in open-end funds. Both these advantages can work to increase the distributions paid to FLC’s common shareholders.
These benefits are accompanied by investment risks that do not exist with open-end funds. Open-end funds issue and redeem shares directly with their shareholders at a price equal to the underlying value of all fund assets (Net Asset Value or NAV). Closed-end fund shareholders do not have the right to redeem their shares. Instead, closed-end fund shareholders buy and sell their shares on markets like the New York Stock Exchange. A closed-end fund’s shares should trade relative to the NAV of the fund – the market, however, further exposes the price of the shares to the laws of supply and demand and the price can and does vary widely from NAV.
Supply and demand for a fund is dictated by each investor’s perception of the underlying value of the shares relative to other available investment options.
The starting point for any investor considering selling or purchasing shares of a fund is the NAV calculated by the fund. With income funds, like FLC, investors also consider distribution levels. These two performance components of NAV and income are reflected in the fund’s total investment return on NAV. In fact, the best measure of the performance of an investment adviser is the fund’s total return based on NAV.
Like all investors, investors in closed-end funds make their own decisions about the fundamental quality of a fund’s NAV and the likelihood that it will continue to produce similar total returns on NAV. An investor may value a fund’s shares at a premium to NAV if the investor believes that the fund is likely to perform better than it has in the past, because of projected distribution levels, net asset value, net asset value volatility, call protection, quality of fund management and portfolio credit quality. Alternatively, an investor may similarly value a fund’s shares at a discount to NAV based on negative interpretations of the same factors.
Investor decisions are never made in isolation, however, and supply and demand cannot be fully understood without reference to the market conditions for a fund’s shares and the investor’s objectives and alternative investment opportunities. In other words, an investor may decide to purchase or sell shares of a fund based on reasons unrelated to his or her assessment of the fund’s total return on NAV. Commentators speculate that some investors apply an automatic discount to NAV because of the nature of the closed-end fund structure itself – yet some funds consistently trade at premiums. Once an investor has decided to purchase shares of a closed-end fund (perhaps because of some of their inherent advantages), comparative performance matters as well. Stated another way, a fixed-income investor will typically gravitate to that fund in a group of funds with similar investment objectives which offers the best yield for the amount of risk involved.
Finally, investment decisions may be motivated for reasons beyond the performance of the fund, the closed-end structure, or comparative performance. Investors always have personal economic situations that impact their decisions. One example of this may be year-end tax selling. If an investor has losses in a closed-end fund, and gains in some other investment, that investor may make a rational decision to sell his or her shares of the fund at year-end in order to offset any tax gains. In a market environment, tax selling is especially detrimental because it can provide increased supply which may drive down the market price which can in turn lead to more tax selling.
Of course, no single reason can explain the price determined by a market. There are as many reasons, or combination of reasons, as there are shareholders for why each investor sells or buys shares. And, in the end, the collective effect of all these investor decisions may result in market prices at a premium or discount to NAV.
FLC is no different than any other closed-end fund, and its market price will be controlled by the laws of supply and demand.
What are the differences between "closed-end funds" and "open-end funds"?
Closed-end funds such as FLC differ from open-end funds in some very important ways.
First, let's identify the similarities. In general terms, both types are built around professionally managed portfolios intended to meet a specific investment objective. At any point in time, the value of the portfolio can be determined, and, adjusting for any liabilities incurred by the fund, used to calculate the net asset value ("NAV"). The NAV per share is the intrinsic value of one share of the fund.
The key difference between a closed-end fund and an open-end fund is the manner in which the shares change hands. Closed-end funds issue a fixed number of shares at the inception of the fund (hence the term "closed"). The shares are usually listed on a major stock exchange (FLC is listed on the NYSE) and the price of the shares will fluctuate based on what a willing buyer would pay for the shares of a willing seller(just like buying or selling shares of Microsoft or any other listed company). The price may or may not bear a close relationship to the NAV. If the market price is above the NAV, the Fund is said to be trading at a "premium". If the market price is below the NAV, the Fund is said to be trading at a "discount".
Open-end funds issue new shares and redeem old shares daily (hence the term "open"). During business hours, investors may indicate to the fund their desire to purchase or sell shares in the fund. The fund will compute the NAV as of the close of business and either issue new shares or redeem outstanding shares at that NAV.
There are other important differences (for example, it is more common for closed-end funds to employ leverage), but the key difference is the mechanism for trading the shares of each.Principal Risks of the Fund
The Fund is a non-diversified, closed-end management investment company designed primarily as a long-term investment and not as a trading vehicle. The Fund is not intended to be a complete investment program and, due to the uncertainty inherent in all investments, there can be no assurance that the Fund will achieve its investment objective.
Investment Risk. An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of the entire principal amount that you invest. The Fund’s Common Shares may be affected by such factors as liquidity and market supply and demand. In addition, the common shares of closed-end management investment companies frequently trade at a discount from their NAV. The Fund cannot assure you that its Common Shares will trade at a price higher than or equal to NAV.
Market Risk. The market values of securities owned by the Fund may decline, at times sharply and unpredictably. Under normal conditions, markets generally move in cycles over time, with periods of rising prices followed by periods of declining prices. These fluctuations could be a sustained trend or a drastic movement and the value of your investment may reflect these fluctuations. The Fund may utilize leverage, which magnifies this risk. Your Common Shares at any point in time may be worth less than what you invested, even after taking into account the reinvestment of Fund dividends and distributions. See “Use of Leverage—Leverage Risk.”
Preferred and Subordinated Securities Risk. Preferred and other subordinated securities rank lower than bonds and other debt instruments in a company’s capital structure and therefore will be subject to greater credit risk than those debt instruments. Distributions on some types of these securities may also be skipped or deferred by issuers without causing a default. Finally, some of these securities typically have special redemption rights that allow the issuer to redeem the security at par earlier than scheduled. If this occurs, the Fund may be forced to reinvest in lower yielding securities. There are various risks associated with investing in preferred securities, including:

Deferral and Omission Risk. Preferred securities may include provisions that permit the issuer, at its discretion, to defer or omit distributions for a stated period without any adverse consequences to the issuer. In certain cases, deferring or omitting distributions may be mandatory. If the Fund owns a preferred security for which distributions are deferred, the Fund may well be required to recognize income for tax purposes although it has not yet received a corresponding distribution.
Call and Reinvestment Risk. During periods of declining interest rates, an issuer may be able to exercise an option to redeem its issue at par earlier than scheduled, which is generally known as call risk. An issuer may redeem an obligation if the issuer can refinance the debt at a lower cost due to declining interest rates or an improvement in the credit standing of the issuer. If this occurs, the Fund may be forced to reinvest in lower yielding securities. This is known as reinvestment risk. Preferred securities frequently have call features that allow the issuer to repurchase the security prior to its stated maturity.
Limited Voting Rights Risk. Generally, traditional preferred securities offer no voting rights with respect to the issuer unless preferred dividends have been in arrears for a specified number of periods, at which time the preferred security holders may have the ability to elect a director or directors to the issuer’s board. Generally, once all the arrearages have been paid, the preferred security holders no longer have voting rights. Hybrid-preferred security holders generally have no voting rights.
Special Redemption Rights. In certain varying circumstances, an issuer of preferred securities may redeem the securities prior to their scheduled call or maturity date. For instance, for certain types of preferred securities, a redemption may be triggered by a change in U.S. federal income tax or securities laws. As with call provisions, a redemption by the issuer may negatively impact the return of the security held by the Fund. The Dodd-Frank Act and other proposed regulatory changes affecting the financial services industries may increase issuers’ incentives to call or redeem a security prior to its scheduled call or maturity date.
New Types of Securities. From time to time, preferred securities, including hybrid-preferred securities, have been, and may in the future be, offered having features other than those described herein. The Fund reserves the right to invest in these securities if the Adviser believes that doing so would be consistent with the Fund’s investment objective and policies. If the Fund invests materially in these new types of securities, the Fund will provide information in its report to shareholders. Since the market for these instruments would be new, the Fund may have difficulty disposing of them at a suitable price and time. In addition to limited liquidity and high price volatility risks, these instruments may present other risks that are consistent with the risks disclosed in the Prospectus. The Dodd-Frank Act and proposed regulations affecting the financial services industries could lead to the issuance of new forms of preferred and hybrid-preferred securities with features such as automatic equity conversion and/or write downs from par value under certain circumstances. Such conversion or write-down features might be applied by regulators to existing securities as well.

The Dodd-Frank Act contains provisions which will make certain hybrid-preferred securities less attractive for issuing banks, which the Adviser believes is likely to result in a significant reduction in the availability of these types of securities and potentially in many outstanding issues being redeemed. These changes may negatively impact the prices of some securities, particularly those trading above their par values as the new legislation may make near-term redemptions at par possible. However, other securities may be positively affected, particularly those trading at discounts to par value. Such securities may experience an increase in market value from issuers’ redemption activity. A longer-term consequence of the relevant provisions of the Dodd-Frank Act, which are to be phased in over a period of a few years, is the potential for some types of preferred securities in which the Fund intends to invest to become more scarce and potentially less liquid. In addition, proposals of the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision to update capital requirements for banks globally, if finalized and adopted in the United States, would further limit the attractiveness to issuing banks of a broader range of preferred security types and possibly have more significant consequences, including a smaller market of issues and less liquidity. It is not possible to predict the impact of the Dodd-Frank Act and these proposals on the Fund’s ability to pursue its investment strategy. Although it is expected that over time new types of preferred securities in which the Fund may invest will be issued, the availability of such investments cannot be determined.
Credit Risk. Credit risk is the risk that an issuer of a security will be unable or unwilling to make dividend, interest and principal payments when due and the related risk that the value of a security may decline because of concerns about the issuer’s ability to make such payments. Credit risk may be heightened for the Fund because the Fund may invest in “high yield” or “high risk” securities; such securities, while generally offering higher yields than investment grade securities with similar maturities, involve greater risks, including the possibility of default or bankruptcy, and are regarded as predominantly speculative with respect to the issuer’s capacity to pay dividends and interest and repay principal.
Interest Rate Risk. Interest rate risk is the risk that preferred and other income-producing securities will decline in value because of rising market interest rates. When market interest rates rise, the market value of such securities generally will fall. Preferred securities with longer periods before maturity (if any) or longer durations may be more sensitive to interest rate changes.
Duration Risk. Duration is the sensitivity, expressed in years, of the price of a fixed-income security to changes in the general level of interest rates (or yields). Securities with longer durations tend to be more sensitive to interest rate (or yield) changes than securities with shorter durations. For example, a three-year duration means a bond is expected to decrease in value by 3% if interest rates rise 1% and increase in value by 3% if interest rates fall 1%. Because the Fund initially expects to have a long duration, it will be more sensitive to interest rate or yield changes. Although the Fund can buy securities of any maturity, it initially expects to have an effective duration between 9 and 14 years. Because of events affecting the bond markets and interest rate changes, the duration of the portfolio might not meet its target duration at all times. Duration differs from maturity in that it considers potential changes to interest rates, and a security’s coupon payments, yield, price and par value and call features, in addition to the amount of time until the security matures. Various techniques may be used to shorten or lengthen the Fund’s duration, including investments in floating-rate and fixed-to-floating-rate securities and interest rate and other hedging transactions such as pay-fixed interest rate swaps, interest rate cap transactions or Eurodollar strips, designed to reduce the interest rate risk. The duration of a security will be expected to change over time with changes in market factors and time to maturity.
Floating-Rate and Fixed-to-Floating-Rate Securities Risk. The market value of floating-rate securities is a reflection of discounted expected cash flows based on expectations for future interest rate resets. The market value of such securities may fall in a declining interest rate environment and may also fall in a rising interest rate environment if there is a lag between the rise in interest rates and the reset. This risk may also be present with respect to fixed-to-floating-rate securities in which the Fund may invest. A secondary risk associated with declining interest rates is the risk that income earned by the Fund on floating-rate and fixed-to-floating-rate securities will decline due to lower coupon payments on floating-rate securities.
Liquidity Risk. The Fund may invest, without limit, in illiquid securities. From time to time, certain securities held by the Fund may have limited marketability and may be difficult to sell at favorable times or prices. It is possible that certain securities held by the Fund will not be able to be sold in sufficient amounts or in a sufficiently timely manner to raise the cash necessary to meet any potentially large redemption requests by Fund shareholders.
Concentration Risk. The Fund intends to invest 25% or more of its total assets in the financials sector. This policy makes the Fund more susceptible to adverse economic or regulatory occurrences affecting the financials sector.
Financials Sector Risk. Because the Fund invests 25% or more of its total assets in the financials sector, it will be more susceptible to adverse economic or regulatory occurrences affecting this sector, such as changes in interest rates, loan concentration and competition. In many countries, companies in the financials sector are regulated by governmental entities, which can increase costs for new services or products and make it difficult to pass increased costs on to consumers. In certain areas, deregulation of financial companies has resulted in increased competition and reduced profitability for certain companies. The profitability of many types of financial companies may be adversely affected in certain market cycles, including periods of rising interest rates, which may restrict the availability and increase the cost of capital, and declining economic conditions, which may cause credit losses due to financial difficulties of borrowers. Because many types of financial companies are vulnerable to these economic cycles, the Fund’s investments in these companies may lose significant value during such periods.
The financial services industries also are subject to relatively rapid changes as a result of industry consolidation trends which may result in distinctions between different financial service segments (for example, banking, insurance and brokerage businesses) becoming less clear. In the recent past, the financial services industries have experienced considerable financial distress, which has led to the implementation of government programs designed to ease that distress.
REITs Risk. Investments in REITs expose the Fund to risks similar to investing directly in real estate. The value of these underlying investments may be affected by changes in the value of the underlying real estate, the quality of the property management, the creditworthiness of the issuer of the investments, and changes in property taxes, interest rates and the real estate regulatory environment. Investments in REITs are also affected by general economic conditions.
Foreign Investment Risk. Investments in foreign securities involve certain risks not involved in domestic investments. Securities markets in certain foreign countries are not as developed, efficient or liquid as securities markets in the United States. Therefore, the prices of foreign securities can be volatile. Certain foreign countries may impose restrictions on the ability of issuers of foreign securities to make payments of principal and interest to investors located outside the country, due to blockage of foreign currency exchanges or otherwise. In addition, the Fund will be subject to risks associated with adverse political and economic developments in foreign countries, which could cause the Fund to lose money on its investments in foreign securities. Furthermore, certain investments in foreign securities also may be subject to foreign withholding taxes, and dividend income the Fund receives from foreign securities may not be eligible for reduced rates of taxation that may be applicable to QDI.
Investing in these foreign securities involves certain risks not involved in domestic investments, including, but not limited to:

future foreign economic, financial, political and social developments;
different legal systems;
the possible imposition of exchange controls or other foreign governmental laws or restrictions;
less governmental supervision;
regulation changes;
changes in currency exchange rates;
less publicly available information about companies due to less rigorous disclosure or accounting standards or regulatory practices;
high and volatile rates of inflation;
fluctuating interest rates; and different accounting, auditing and financial record-keeping standards and requirements.

In addition, individual foreign economies may differ favorably or unfavorably from the U.S. economy in such respects as:

growth of gross domestic product;
rates of inflation;
capital reinvestment;
resources;
self-sufficiency; and
balance of payments position.

To the extent the Fund has investments in a geographic region or country, the Fund will be subject to the risks of adverse changes in that region or country. In addition, income from the Fund’s investments in certain foreign securities may also be subject to foreign withholding taxes, which would reduce the Fund’s return on those securities.
As a result of these potential risks, the Adviser may determine that, notwithstanding otherwise favorable investment criteria, it may not be practicable or appropriate to invest in a particular country. The Fund may invest in countries in which foreign investors, including the Adviser, have had no or limited prior experience.
Currency Risk. Although the Fund will report its net asset value and pay dividends in U.S. dollars, foreign securities often are purchased with, and make dividend or interest payments in, foreign currencies. Therefore, when the Fund invests in foreign securities, it will be subject to foreign currency risk, which means that the Fund’s net asset value could decline as a result of changes in the exchange rates between foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar. Certain foreign countries may impose restrictions on the ability of issuers of foreign securities to make payments of principal, interest or dividends to investors located outside the country, due to blockage of foreign currency exchanges or other factors. The Fund’s transactions in foreign currencies may increase or accelerate the Fund’s recognition of ordinary income and may affect the timing or character of the Fund’s distributions.
Convertible Securities Risk. Although to a lesser extent than with non-convertible fixed-income securities, the market value of convertible securities tends to decline as interest rates increase and, conversely, tends to increase as interest rates decline. In addition, because of the conversion feature, the market value of convertible securities tends to vary with fluctuations in the market value of the underlying common stock. A unique feature of convertible securities is that as the market price of the underlying common stock declines, convertible securities tend to trade increasingly on a yield basis, and so may not experience market value declines to the same extent as the underlying common stock. When the market price of the underlying common stock increases, the prices of the convertible securities tend to rise as a reflection of the value of the underlying common stock.
High Yield Securities Risk. The Fund may invest in securities that are rated below investment grade. Securities rated below investment grade are regarded as having predominantly speculative characteristics with respect to the issuer’s capacity to pay interest and repay principal, and these bonds are commonly referred to as “junk bonds.” These securities are subject to a greater risk of default. The prices of these lower grade securities are more sensitive to negative developments, such as a decline in the issuer’s revenues or a general economic downturn, than are the prices of higher grade securities. Lower grade securities tend to be less liquid than investment grade securities. The market values of lower grade securities tend to be more volatile than investment grade securities.
Lower-rated securities, or equivalent unrated securities, may be considered speculative with respect to the issuer’s continuing ability to make principal and interest payments. Analysis of the creditworthiness of issuers of lower-rated securities may be more complex than for issuers of higher quality debt securities, and the Fund’s ability to achieve its investment objective may, to the extent it is invested in lower-rated securities, be more dependent upon such creditworthiness analysis than would be the case if it were investing in higher quality securities. An issuer of these securities has a currently identifiable vulnerability to default and the issuer may be in default or there may be present elements of danger with respect to principal or interest.
The secondary markets in which lower-rated securities are traded may be less liquid than the market for higher grade securities. Less liquidity in the secondary trading markets could adversely affect the price at which the Fund could sell a particular lower-rated security when necessary to meet liquidity needs or in response to a specific economic event, such as a deterioration in the creditworthiness of the issuer, and could adversely affect and cause large fluctuations in the net asset value of the Fund’s shares. Adverse publicity and investor perceptions may decrease the values and liquidity of high yield securities.
It is reasonable to expect that any adverse economic conditions could disrupt the market for lower-rated securities, have an adverse impact on the value of those securities and adversely affect the ability of the issuers of those securities to repay principal or interest on those securities. New laws and proposed new laws may adversely impact the market for lower-rated securities.
Rating agencies are private services that provide ratings of the credit quality of debt obligations, including convertible securities. Appendix B to the SAI describes the various ratings assigned to financial obligations by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. (“Moody’s”), Standard and Poor’s Ratings Group, a subsidiary of The McGraw Hill Companies (“S&P”) and Fitch, Inc. (“Fitch”). Ratings assigned by a rating agency are not absolute standards of credit quality and do not evaluate market risks or the liquidity of securities. Rating agencies may fail to make timely changes in credit ratings and an issuer’s current financial condition may be better or worse than a rating indicates. Credit rating agencies may be paid by the companies whose securities they analyze and grade. To the extent that the issuer of a security pays a rating agency for the analysis of its security, an inherent conflict of interest may exist that could affect the reliability of the rating. The Fund will not necessarily sell a security when its rating is reduced below what its rating was at the time of purchase. The Adviser does not rely solely on credit ratings, and develops its own analysis of issuer credit quality. The ratings of a security may change over time. S&P, Moody’s and Fitch monitor and evaluate the ratings assigned to securities on an ongoing basis. As a result, securities held by the Fund could receive a higher rating (which would tend to increase their value) or a lower rating (which would tend to decrease their value) during the period in which they are held.
Because the Fund may invest in high yield securities, the Fund’s success in achieving its investment objective may depend more heavily on the Adviser’s analysis than if the Fund invested exclusively in higher-quality and rated securities. The Adviser will attempt to reduce the risks of investing in lower rated securities through active portfolio management, credit analysis and attention to current developments and trends in the economy and the financial markets.
Selection Risk. Selection risk is the risk that the securities selected by Fund management will underperform the markets, the relevant indices or the securities selected by other funds with similar investment objectives and investment strategies. This means you may lose money.
Management Risk. The Fund is an actively managed portfolio and its success depends upon the investment skills and analytical abilities of the Adviser to develop and effectively implement strategies that achieve the Fund’s investment objective. Subjective decisions made by the Adviser may cause the Fund to incur losses or to miss profit opportunities on which it may otherwise have capitalized.
Leverage Risk. Leverage is a speculative technique and there are special risks and costs associated with leveraging. If the Fund utilizes leverage, the fees paid to the Adviser for investment advisory and management services will be higher than if the Fund did not utilize leverage because the fees paid will be calculated based on the Fund’s Managed Assets, which include the principal amount of outstanding Borrowings and the liquidation preference of Preferred Shares, if any, and the proceeds of any Reverse Repurchase Agreements.
Risk of Market Price Discount from Net Asset Value. Shares of closed-end funds frequently trade at a discount from their net asset value. This characteristic is a risk separate and distinct from the risk that net asset value could decrease as a result of investment activities and may be greater for investors expecting to sell their shares in a relatively short period following completion of this offering. We cannot predict whether the Common Shares will trade at, above or below net asset value. Net asset value will be reduced immediately following the offering of the Common Shares by the amount of the sales load and the amount of organizational and offering expenses paid by the Fund, to the extent such expenses are not borne by the Adviser. Whether investors will realize gains or losses upon the sale of the shares will depend not upon the Fund’s net asset value but entirely upon whether the market price of the shares at the time of sale is above or below the investor’s purchase price for the shares. Because the market price of the shares will be determined by factors such as relative supply of and demand for shares in the market, general market and economic conditions, and other factors beyond the control of the Fund, we cannot predict whether the shares will trade at, above or below net asset value, or at below or above the initial public offering price.
Additional Risks.
See “Additional Risk Considerations” beginning on page 18 of the prospectus for additional risks relating to an investment in the Fund, including: Management Risk; Potential Conflicts of Interest Risk; Dependence on Key Personnel Risk; Portfolio Turnover Risk; Risk of Anti-Takeover Provisions; Derivatives Risk; Investment in Other Companies Risk; and Market Disruption Risk. 






Back to Top










 





Performance | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated
















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










Performance
Monthly Total Returns
as of 6/30/17


 Market PriceNAV



YTD
16.55%
13.51%


1 Year
9.99%
15.56%


3 Year
12.30%
9.70%


5 Year
11.76%
11.96%


10 Year
11.09%
9.36%


Since Inception (8/29/03)
8.59%
8.24%


Calendar Year Total Returns


 Market PriceNAV

2016
12.43%
7.36%


2015
5.20%
3.78%


2014
15.61%
18.28%


2013
-0.29%
3.31%


2012
17.93%
27.55%


2011
19.09%
9.33%


2010
29.49%
27.83%


2009
107.94%
77.55%


2008
-45.57%
-43.89%


2007
-15.08%
-11.39%


2006
20.93%
9.03%


2005
-16.05%
1.33%


2004
4.00%
6.99%


2003 (Partial Year)
4.88%
3.97%


Quarterly Total Returns
as of 3/31/17


 Market PriceNAV



YTD
8.65%
6.20%


1 Year
13.03%
13.46%


3 Year
10.98%
9.36%


5 Year
11.19%
11.23%


10 Year
9.50%
8.52%


Since Inception (8/29/03)
8.19%
7.87%


Performance data quoted represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results, and current performance
may be lower or higher than the figures shown. Since Inception returns assume a purchase of common shares at the
initial offering price of $25.00 per share for market price returns or initial net asset value (NAV) of $23.88 per share for
NAV returns. Returns for periods of less than one year are not annualized. All distributions are assumed to be reinvested
either in accordance with the dividend reinvestment plan (DRIP) for market price returns or NAV for NAV returns. Until the
DRIP price is available from the Plan Agent, the market price returns reflect the reinvestment at the closing market price
on the last business day of the month. Once the DRIP is available around mid-month, the market price returns are
updated to reflect reinvestment at the DRIP price. 






Back to Top










 





Distributions & Tax Info | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated
















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










Distributions & Tax Info
Distribution History
Download CSV



Record Date
Ex-Distribution Date
Payable Date
Declaration Date
Total Distribution
Drip Price




7/24/17
7/20/17
7/31/17
7/3/17
$0.133000
 - 


6/23/17
6/21/17
6/30/17
6/5/17
$0.133000
 - 


5/23/17
5/19/17
5/31/17
5/1/17
$0.133000
$21.520000


4/21/17
4/19/17
4/28/17
4/4/17
$0.133000
$21.240000


3/24/17
3/22/17
3/31/17
3/6/17
$0.133000
$20.790000


2/21/17
2/16/17
2/28/17
2/6/17
$0.133000
$20.487600


1/24/17
1/20/17
1/31/17
1/10/17
$0.133000
$20.420000


12/22/16
12/20/16
12/30/16
12/13/16
$0.133000
$19.960000


11/22/16
11/18/16
11/30/16
11/7/16
$0.136000
 - 


10/24/16
10/20/16
10/31/16
10/4/16
$0.136000
$20.770000


9/23/16
9/21/16
9/30/16
9/6/16
$0.136000
 - 


8/24/16
8/22/16
8/31/16
8/1/16
$0.136000
$21.090000


7/22/16
7/20/16
7/29/16
7/5/16
$0.136000
$20.820000


6/23/16
6/21/16
6/30/16
6/6/16
$0.136000
 - 


5/23/16
5/19/16
5/31/16
5/2/16
$0.136000
 - 


4/22/16
4/20/16
4/29/16
4/4/16
$0.136000
 - 


3/23/16
3/21/16
3/31/16
3/7/16
$0.136000
$19.840000


2/22/16
2/18/16
2/29/16
2/1/16
$0.136000
$19.430000


1/22/16
1/20/16
1/29/16
1/4/16
$0.136000
$19.790000


12/23/15
12/21/15
12/31/15
12/8/15
$0.136000
$19.264000


11/20/15
11/18/15
11/30/15
11/2/15
$0.136000
$19.453300


10/23/15
10/21/15
10/30/15
10/5/15
$0.136000
$19.252000


9/23/15
9/21/15
9/30/15
9/8/15
$0.136000
$18.519900


8/24/15
8/20/15
8/31/15
8/3/15
$0.136000
$18.368900


7/24/15
7/22/15
7/31/15
7/6/15
$0.136000
$19.079800


6/23/15
6/19/15
6/30/15
6/1/15
$0.136000
$19.850000


5/21/15
5/19/15
5/29/15
5/5/15
$0.136000
$20.599600


4/23/15
4/21/15
4/30/15
4/6/15
$0.136000
$20.632100


3/24/15
3/20/15
3/31/15
3/2/15
$0.136000
$20.199500


2/20/15
2/18/15
2/27/15
2/3/15
$0.136000
$20.788900


1/23/15
1/21/15
1/30/15
1/5/15
$0.136000
$21.180000


12/23/14
12/19/14
12/31/14
12/5/14
$0.136000
$20.028000


11/20/14
11/18/14
11/28/14
11/3/14
$0.136000
$21.008300


10/24/14
10/22/14
10/31/14
10/6/14
$0.136000
$20.218300


9/23/14
9/19/14
9/30/14
9/8/14
$0.136000
$19.674200


8/22/14
8/20/14
8/29/14
8/5/14
$0.136000
$19.924700


7/24/14
7/22/14
7/31/14
7/7/14
$0.136000
$19.120000


6/23/14
6/19/14
6/30/14
6/2/14
$0.136000
$20.033500


5/22/14
5/20/14
5/30/14
5/5/14
$0.136000
$20.172200


4/23/14
4/21/14
4/30/14
4/7/14
$0.136000
$20.410000


3/24/14
3/20/14
3/31/14
3/3/14
$0.136000
$19.909000


2/21/14
2/19/14
2/28/14
2/5/14
$0.136000
$19.240000


1/24/14
1/22/14
1/31/14
1/6/14
$0.136000
$18.749900


12/23/13
12/19/13
12/31/13
12/11/13
$0.092000
$18.667500


12/23/13
12/19/13
12/31/13
12/11/13
$0.136000
$18.667500


11/21/13
11/19/13
11/29/13
11/5/13
$0.136000
$18.148900


10/24/13
10/22/13
10/31/13
10/7/13
$0.136000
$18.399900


9/23/13
9/19/13
9/30/13
9/19/13
$0.136000
$18.211800


8/23/13
8/21/13
8/30/13
8/5/13
$0.136000
$18.320600


7/24/13
7/22/13
7/31/13
7/1/13
$0.136000
$19.619900


6/21/13
6/19/13
6/28/13
6/3/13
$0.136000
$19.760000


5/24/13
5/22/13
5/31/13
5/6/13
$0.136000
$19.590000


4/23/13
4/19/13
4/30/13
4/1/13
$0.136000
$21.050000


3/21/13
3/19/13
3/28/13
3/4/13
$0.136000
$20.700000


2/21/13
2/19/13
2/28/13
2/5/13
$0.136000
$20.580000


1/24/13
1/22/13
1/31/13
1/7/13
$0.136000
$20.520000


12/21/12
12/19/12
12/31/12
12/10/12
$0.136000
$20.190000


12/21/12
12/19/12
12/31/12
12/10/12
$0.085000
$20.190000


11/23/12
11/20/12
11/30/12
12/10/12
$0.139500
$20.190000


10/24/12
10/22/12
10/31/12
10/1/12
$0.139500
$20.260000


9/21/12
9/19/12
9/28/12
9/4/12
$0.139500
$19.840000


8/24/12
8/22/12
8/31/12
8/6/12
$0.139500
$20.210000


7/24/12
7/20/12
7/31/12
7/2/12
$0.139500
$19.490000


6/22/12
6/20/12
6/29/12
6/4/12
$0.139500
$18.680000





See the Funds Section 19a-1 letters, if any, located on the Fund's website under the "Fund News" section of the News & Literature Tab for estimates of distribution sources other than income. See the "Tax Information" below for final characterization of the Fund's distributions for federal income tax purposes.
The dividend history represents dividends that were paid by the Fund and is not a guarantee of the Fund's future dividend-paying ability. If you participate in the "DRIP" (the Dividend Reinvestment Plan) your income is reinvested in additional common shares. The reinvestment price is determined by one of two scenarios. One, if the common shares are trading at a discount, the DRIP price is the weighted average cost to purchase the common shares from the NYSE or elsewhere. Lastly, if the common shares are trading at a premium, the DRIP price is the determined by taking either the higher of the NAV or approximately 95% of the common share price.2016 Tax Information


Total Ordinary Dividends1Tax-Exempt Income2Long-Term Capital Gains3Return of Capital4Qualified Dividend Income (QDI)5Dividends Received Deduction6Direct U.S. Government Obligations7Alternative Minimum Tax (AMT)8

100.00%
0.00%
0.00%
0.00%
72.15%
35.78%
0.00%
0.00%


Ordinary Dividends, Tax-Exempt Income, Long-Term Capital Gains and Return of Capital figures are a percentage of the total distribution.
Final determination of the tax character of distributions paid by the Fund for the current calendar year will be distributed to shareholders in January of the following year.

Reported on Form 1099-DIV in box 1a; shows the percentage of total distributions designated as ordinary dividends.
Percentage of the total distribution that is exempt from federal income tax (i.e. municipal securities).
Reported on Form 1099-DIV in box 2a; shows the percentage of total distributions designated as long-term capital gain distributions.
Reported on Form 1099-DIV in box 3; portion of distribution that is nontaxable (i.e. return of capital basis).
Reported on Form 1099-DIV in box 1b; the percentage of total ordinary dividends that may be eligible for the 15% or 5% long-term capital gains rates.
Percentage of total ordinary dividends that may be eligible for the corporate dividends received deduction.
Percentage of total ordinary dividends from direct U.S. government obligations.
Represents the amount of tax-exempt income that is subject to the AMT calculation. Destra Capital Investments does not provide tax advice, and investors should consult their tax advisor for further information.

This information does not represent an offer to sell securities of the funds and it is not soliciting an offer to buy securities of the funds. There can be no assurance that any closed-end fund will achieve its investment objective(s). Past performance does not guarantee future results. The value of any closed-end fund will fluctuate with the value of the underlying securities. The portions of the distributions deemed “Ordinary Income, Tax Exempt Income, Long-Term Capital Gains, Qualified Dividend Income, Dividends Received Deduction, Direct U.S. Gov’t Obligations, Alternative Minimum Tax, and Return of Capital” are not indicative of future distributions and these figures may not be achieved in future years. Historically closed-end funds often trade at a discount to their net asset value. Please click on each fund link for more information regarding the fund. 
Investors should consider the investment objectives and policies, risk considerations, charges and expenses of the funds carefully before they invest. For this and more information, please contact a securities representative or Destra Capital Investments One North Wacker Drive, 48th Floor, Chicago, Illinois 60606, 877-855-3434. 
The Fund’s shares do not represent a deposit or obligation of, and are not guaranteed or endorsed by, any bank or other insured depository institution, and are not federally insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Federal Reserve Board or any other government agency. 






Back to Top











 





Contact | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










Contact



FLC Transfer Agent


BNY Mellon c/o Computershare


P.O. Box 30170


College Station, TX 77842-3170


866-351-7446


 


FLC Shareholder Servicing Agent


Destra Capital Investments


One North Wacker Drive, 48th Floor


Chicago, IL 60606


877-855-3434


flc@destracapital.com


 


FLC Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm


KPMG LLP


Boston, MA


 


FLC Investment Adviser


Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated


301 East Colorado Boulevard


Suite 720


Pasadena, CA 91101


 






Back to Top










 





Portfolio | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated
















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










Portfolio

Sector Concentration

	as of 6/30/17	(percentage of securities)




Sector
%




Bank
53.91 %


Finance
0.23 %


Insurance
23.63 %


Utility
11.74 %


REIT
0.54 %


Energy
5.33 %


Communications
0.57 %


Govt
0.00 %


Miscellaneous
4.05 %



This data is subject to change on a daily basis.




Top 25 Issuers

	as of 6/30/17	(percentage of securities)




Name
%




MetLife
4.86 %


PNC Financial Services Group
4.81 %


JPMorgan Chase
4.72 %


Wells Fargo & Company
4.16 %


Liberty Mutual Group
3.78 %


Citigroup
3.58 %


BNP Paribas
3.39 %


Fifth Third Bancorp
3.15 %


Enbridge Energy Partners
2.96 %


XL Group Limited
2.69 %


Bank of America Corporation
2.46 %


HSBC PLC
2.41 %


Georgia Power
2.23 %


New York Community Bancorp
2.09 %


CoBank ACB
2.06 %


QBE Insurance Group Limited
1.91 %


Morgan Stanley
1.70 %


Standard Chartered PLC
1.56 %


Dominion Energy Inc
1.53 %


PartnerRe Ltd
1.45 %


Land O Lakes
1.45 %


First Horizon National Corporation
1.42 %


Delphi Financial
1.41 %


State Street Corporation
1.38 %


Barclays Bank PLC
1.31 %



This data is subject to change on a daily basis. 
Credit Quality

	as of 6/30/17	(percentage of securities)




Moody's Ratings
%




Aaa
0.00 %


Aa
0.00 %


A
1.05 %


Baa
62.47 %


Ba
28.48 %


B
0.22 %


Below B
0.00 %


Not Rated
7.78 %







Credit quality is an assessment of the credit worthiness of an issuer of the underlying security and not the Fund or its shares. Bonds with a credit rating of Ba or lower are considered below investment grade. "Not Rated" includes options, common stock and unrated securities by Moody's. Ratings are subject to change. This data is subject to change on a daily basis. Ratings shown are assigned by Moody's
Geographic Breakdown
as of 6/30/17 (percentage of securities)


Country%



United States
77.20 %


Bermuda
6.50 %


United Kingdom
5.30 %


France
3.70 %


Australia
3.30 %


Canada
2.50 %


Netherlands
1.20 %


Mexico
0.20 %



This data is subject to change on a daily basis.


 
 






Back to Top











 





News & Literature | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated
















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated










News & Literature
 
Shareholder Reports



 
					View
				





							FLC Q1 2017 Report
						



						2/29/2017					


							The 2017 first quarter report for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund. 						





 
					View
				





							FLC Annual Report
						



						11/30/16					


							The 2015 annual report for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund.						





 
					View
				





							FLC Q3 2016 Report
						



						8/31/16					


							The 2016 third quarter report for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund. 						





 
					View
				





							FLC Semi-Annual Report
						



						5/31/16					


							The 2016 semi-annual report for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund. 						





 
					View
				





							FLC Q1 2016 Report
						



						2/29/2016					


							The 2016 first quarter report for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund. 						



 
Proxy Information





					View
				





							FLC Proxy Information
						



						3/14/17					


							Proxy information for FLC.						



 
News Releases



 
					View
				





							DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
						



						7/20/17					


							New regular monthly dividend announced.						





 
					View
				





							DFP, FFC and FLC Declare Regular Monthly Dividend Rate and DFP Announces a Special Year-End Distribution
						



						12/13/16					


							Monthly dividend announcement.						





 
					View
				





							DFP, FFC and FLC Announce Results of Annual Election of Officers
						



						4/21/15					


							The Boards of Directors of Flaherty & Crumrine Dynamic Preferred and Income Fund Incorporated (NYSE: DFP), Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Securities Income Fund Incorporated (NYSE: FFC) and Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated (FLC) today elected new officers of the funds. 						





 
					View
				





							FLC Announces Special Year-End Distribution.
						



						12/10/13					


							FLC press release announcing a special year-end distribution for 2013. 						







					View
				





							FFC and FLC Announce Completed Name Change
						



						3/6/13					


							Press release for name change and appointment of Destra Capital Investments LLC as Shareholder Servicing Agent.						







					View
				





							FFC and FLC Announce Monthly Dividends
						



						12/10/12					


							FFC and FLC Announce their Regular Monthly Dividends and Special Year-End Dividend.						



 
Fact Card





					View
				



FLC Fact Card



6/30/17

Fact Card for the Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund.



 
Other Publications



 
					View
				





							Flaherty & Crumrine First Quarter 2017 US Economic Update
						



						5/9/17					


							First quarter 2017 U.S. Economic Update from Flaherty & Crumrine.						





 
					View
				





							2014 Stress Test and CCAR Summary & Analysis
						



						4/4/2014					


							The Federal Reserve (the “Fed”) released its 2014 Dodd-Frank Act Stress Test (DFAST) results.						







					View
				





							Implications of Proposed Bank Capital Regulations for Investors in Preferred Securities
						



						7/6/12					


							Flaherty & Crumrine discusses the proposed bank capital regulations for investors of preferred securities.						



 
Fund Documents





					View
				





							Adviser Proxy Voting Polices and Procedures
						



						8/8/2013					


							Proxy voting policies and procedures for Flaherty & Crumrine Closed-End Funds.						







					View
				





							Audit Committee Charter
						



						8/8/2013					


							Audit Committee Charter.						







					View
				





							Nominating and Governance Committee Charter
						



						8/8/2013					


							Nominating and Governance Committee Charter						



Filings



Fund’s Filed Section 16 Forms (Forms 3, 4 & 5)


SEC Filings (Forms N-PX, N-Q, NSAR, N-CSR, 3, 4, 5, among others)


Information in periodic reports and fund prospectuses may have changed since the date the document was issued. In particular, the information in the common stock and where applicable, the preferred share prospectuses is historical and should not be relied upon when evaluating whether to purchase, hold or sell shares of the Fund.

 






Back to Top











  FLC Quote - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc   FLC:US   New York        21.70USD   0.54   2.43%     As of 8:04 PM EDT 7/21/2017     Open   21.99    Day Range   21.53 - 21.99    Previous Close   22.24    52Wk Range   18.41 - 22.51    1 Yr Return   6.08%    YTD Return   14.10%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   21.99    Day Range   21.53 - 21.99    Volume   132,276    Previous Close   22.24    52Wk Range   18.41 - 22.51    1 Yr Return   6.32%    YTD Return   14.10%    NAV (on 07/21/2017)   21.85000038    Total Assets (m USD) (on 02/28/2017)   206.933    Inception Date   08/27/2003    Premium/Discount   -0.69%    Average 52-Week Premium   1.10%    Fund Managers   R ERIC CHADWICK    Last Dividend (on 08/22/2017)   0.126    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   6.97%    Expense Ratio   1.34%    3 Mo Return   3.97%    3 Yr Return   11.79%    5 Yr Return   10.28%                Top Fund Holdings       Name Position Value % of Fund        TSTXX:US   BlackRock Liquidity Funds T-Fu    13.06 m 13.06 m 4.20      EP041721:PFD   PNC 6 ⅛ PERP    412.00 k 11.77 m 3.79      EP045264:PFD   FITB 6 ⅝ PERP    369.73 k 10.74 m 3.46      EG871780:COR   EEP 8.05 10/01/37    9.49 k 9.30 m 2.99      EP041493:PFD   AXS 6 ⅞ PERP    338.42 k 8.62 m 2.77      UV482503:COR   BNP 7 ⅜ PERP    7.83 k 7.98 m 2.57      EH293152:COR   MET 9 ¼ 04/08/38    5.34 k 7.42 m 2.39      EH320991:COR   JPM 7.9 PERP    7.00 k 7.29 m 2.35      EP029845:PFD   SO 6 ½ PERP    70.79 k 7.28 m 2.34      EH887582:COR   MET 10 ¾ 08/01/39    4.13 k 6.43 m 2.07           Profile   Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated is a diversified, closed-end management investment company incorporated in the USA.  The Fund's objective is high current income.  At least 80% of the Fund's total assets will be invested in a diversified portfolio of preferred securities and other income-producing securities, consisting of various debt securities.    Address  Flaherty & Crumrine Inc301 E. Colorado BoulevardSuite 720Pasadena, CA 91101USA   Phone  1-626-795-7300   Website   www.preferredincome.com              



    FLC News - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc. Company News & Press Releases - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Open in:



US Market Snapshot
Currencies
Commodities


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc.

                  NYSE: FLC
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc.



Market closed
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 21, 2017, 4:02 p.m.


FLC

/quotes/zigman/330628/composite


$
21.70




Change

-0.54
-2.43%

Volume
Volume 132,276
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/330628/composite
Previous close

$
			22.24
		


$
				21.70
			
Change

-0.54
-2.43%





Day low
Day high
$21.53
$21.99










52 week low
52 week high

            $18.41
        

            $22.51
        

















/news/latest/company/us/flc

      MarketWatch News on FLC
    




 Be selective with preferred-stock ETFs and funds
12:01 a.m. May 7, 2012
 - Jonathan Burton




 Asia in broad regional advance; China Life debuts in Shanghai
7:53 a.m. Jan. 9, 2007
 - Chris Oliver











/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/flc

      Other News on FLC
    





Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

7:30 a.m. July 22, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us

2:11 p.m. July 11, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?

8:31 a.m. April 25, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Is There Something To Prefer In A Preferred Stock?

2:40 p.m. March 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





The John Hancock Preferred Income Fund Offers High Diversification

12:11 p.m. Feb. 21, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

9:28 a.m. Feb. 7, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

1:03 p.m. Jan. 3, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

8:35 p.m. Dec. 10, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

7:47 p.m. Nov. 13, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Size Adjusted

5:13 p.m. Oct. 12, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds

10:43 a.m. Oct. 9, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





NexPoint Credit Strategies Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?

1:53 p.m. Sept. 29, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Income Strategy Fund (PFL): A Good Or Bad Investment?

10:59 a.m. Sept. 26, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Dynamic Credit Income Fund (PCI): A Good Or Bad Investment?

2:45 p.m. Sept. 21, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Western Asset Mortgage Defined Opportunity Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?

1:30 p.m. Sept. 20, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Strategic Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?

8:57 a.m. Sept. 16, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Preferred Stocks Become Preferred ETFs

3:05 a.m. Sept. 1, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





New America High Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?

10:36 a.m. Aug. 30, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Stone Harbor Emerging Markets Total Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?

2:17 a.m. Aug. 29, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Clough Global Allocation Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment

4:02 p.m. Aug. 24, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha


Loading more headlines...







/news/pressrelease/company/us/flc

      Press Releases on FLC
    




 DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
5:37 p.m. July 20, 2017
 - BusinessWire - BZX




 DFP, FFC and FLC Declare Regular Monthly Dividend Rate and DFP 
      Announces a Special Year-End Distribution
9:02 p.m. Dec. 12, 2016
 - BusinessWire - BZX




















Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




12:03 PM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:00pStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms
11:52a'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut
11:27aO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
11:20aActor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71
11:07aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
11:06aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
11:03aYogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions
11:03aQualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight
11:02aPay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 
11:02aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
11:01aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
11:01aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
11:01aNolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
11:00aGE earnings: Departing CEO Immelt’s last chance to bring good things to investors
10:59aBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
10:48aWhy ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are wise to prefer social status over money
10:44aCongress reaches deal on sweeping Russia sanctions bill
10:01aHow to earn $100,000 a year or more with side hustles 
9:59aThe dark side of cruises
9:59aStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms 
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































 





Home | Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated















 














Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated







Fund Information



 



 



 



 



 

 










Back to Top











Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc (FLC)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc (FLC)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsClosed End Funds












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				FLC on New York Consolidated


				21.70USD
21 Jul 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.54


					            (-2.43%)
					        






Prev Close

$22.24


Open

$21.99




Day's High

$21.99


Day's Low

$21.52




Volume

132,276


Avg. Vol

28,269




52-wk High

$22.51


52-wk Low

$18.41












					Full Description



Flaherty & Crumrine/Claymore Total Return Fund Incorporated (the Fund) is a diversified closed-end management investment company. The Fund's primary investment objective is to provide its common shareholders with high current income. The Fund's secondary investment objective is capital appreciation. The Fund invests primarily in a diversified portfolio of preferred and debt securities. This includes fully taxable preferred securities and traditional preferred stocks eligible for the inter-corporate dividends received deduction (DRD). The Fund will invest at least 50% of its total assets in preferred securities. The Fund invests at least 25% of its total assets in securities issued by companies in the utility industry and at least 25% of its total assets issued by companies in the banking industry. The Fund may invest up to 20% of its total assets in securities rated below investment grade. These securities must be rated at least either Ba3 by Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or BB- by Standard & Poor's or, in any case, at the time of purchase. However, these securities must be issued by an issuer having a class of senior debt-rated, investment-grade outstanding. Fund may invest up to 15% of its total assets in common stocks. In addition to foreign money market securities, the Fund may invest up to 30% of its total assets in the securities of companies organized or having their principal place of business outside the United States. The Fund may lend up to 15% of its total assets (including the value of the loan collateral) to certain qualified brokers in order to earn additional income. Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated serves as the Fund's investment adviser.

» Full Overview of FLC







					Company Address



Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc
301 E Colorado Blvd Ste 720PASADENA   CA   91101-1911
P: +1626.7957300F: +1410.3321178







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Donald Crumrine

--




							 R. Eric Chadwick

--




							 Bradford Stone

--




							 Chad Conwell

--




							 Laurie Lodolo

--




» More Officers & Directors





					Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc News




» More FLC  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsClosed End Funds






















FLC Stock Price - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








12:00p

Stocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms



11:52a

Updated
'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut



11:27a

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family



11:20a

Actor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71



11:07a

Updated
Microsoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 



11:05a

Updated
Amazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say



11:02a

Updated
YogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions



11:02a

Updated
Qualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight



11:02a

Updated
Pay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 



11:01a

Updated
Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


FLC


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



FLC
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateFLCAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 4:02 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
21.70



-0.54
-2.43%






Previous Close




$22.2400





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




485.7% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    132.3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 27.2K
            





Open: 21.99
Close: 21.70



21.5250
Day Low/High
21.9900





Day Range



18.4100
52 Week Low/High
22.5099


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$21.99



Day Range
21.5250 - 21.9900



52 Week Range
18.4100 - 22.5099



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
9.95M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.34



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
7.35%



Dividend
$0.13



Ex-Dividend Date
Jul 20, 2017



Short Interest
4.05K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
27.23K




 


Performance




5 Day


-3.34%







1 Month


-2.73%







3 Month


2.12%







YTD


9.21%







1 Year


-1.72%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones











Be selective with preferred-stock ETFs and funds

May. 7, 2012 at 12:02 a.m. ET
by Jonathan Burton









Asia in broad regional advance; China Life debuts in Shanghai


Jan. 9, 2007 at 6:53 a.m. ET
by Chris Oliver













The Risks and Benefits of Buying Preferred Stock


May. 6, 2012 at 4:00 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Russia Rejects Request to Shoulder Debt


Jul. 8, 2009 at 11:28 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fletcher Criticizes Revised Bid from Peak


Mar. 2, 2001 at 4:59 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oil-Services Firms Take a Bath


Jan. 24, 2001 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Techs Support Nasdaq,
But Blue Chips Decline


Aug. 30, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Finance Sector
Extends Rally


Aug. 23, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Transocean to Buy R&B Falcon


Aug. 22, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Apache to Buy Occidental Assets


Jul. 21, 2000 at 12:48 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Dow Industrials Edge Higher
As Nasdaq Composite Tumbles


Oct. 19, 1999 at 12:27 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Shares of Oil Firms
Pump Up Portfolios


Oct. 3, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fear of Rate Increase
Still Plagues Stocks


Aug. 10, 1999 at 12:12 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Rate Worries Hurt Stocks;
IBM, Microsoft, AOL Decline


Jul. 27, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Small-Cap Stocks
Continue Decline


Apr. 9, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Pros See a Lesson
In AT&T Deal


Mar. 22, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









EVI Weatherford to Miss Estimate


Aug. 17, 1998 at 3:25 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Blue-Chip Stocks Tumble
On Global Equity Sell-Off


Aug. 12, 1998 at 12:07 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Dow Drop Leaves
Bargains in Wake


Aug. 7, 1998 at 12:32 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oil Services


Jun. 30, 1998 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









U.S. Currency Intervention
Sends Stock Market Higher


Jun. 18, 1998 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Finnish Firm Buys U.S. Mill


Oct. 1, 1997 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste
Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

Jul. 22, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us
Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us

Jul. 11, 2017 at 2:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?
Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?

Apr. 25, 2017 at 8:31 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Is There Something To Prefer In A Preferred Stock?


Mar. 20, 2017 at 2:40 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The John Hancock Preferred Income Fund Offers High Diversification


Feb. 21, 2017 at 11:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Feb. 7, 2017 at 8:28 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Jan. 3, 2017 at 12:03 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Dec. 10, 2016 at 7:35 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Nov. 13, 2016 at 6:47 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Size Adjusted


Oct. 12, 2016 at 5:13 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds


Oct. 9, 2016 at 10:43 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





NexPoint Credit Strategies Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 29, 2016 at 1:53 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Income Strategy Fund (PFL): A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 26, 2016 at 10:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Dynamic Credit Income Fund (PCI): A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 21, 2016 at 2:45 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Western Asset Mortgage Defined Opportunity Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 20, 2016 at 1:30 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Strategic Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 16, 2016 at 8:57 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Preferred Stocks Become Preferred ETFs


Sep. 1, 2016 at 3:05 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





New America High Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Aug. 30, 2016 at 10:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Stone Harbor Emerging Markets Total Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Aug. 29, 2016 at 2:17 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Clough Global Allocation Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment


Aug. 24, 2016 at 4:02 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate

Jul. 20, 2017 at 5:37 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





DFP, FFC and FLC Declare Regular Monthly Dividend Rate and DFP 
      Announces a Special Year-End Distribution


Dec. 12, 2016 at 8:02 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





KLAC

-1.78%








SBLK

-0.72%








CCXI

0.30%








DEO

-0.66%








PKI

0.09%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Open in:



US Market Snapshot
Currencies
Commodities
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




12:03 PM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:00pStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms
11:52a'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut
11:27aO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
11:20aActor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71
11:07aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
11:06aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
11:03aYogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions
11:03aQualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight
11:02aPay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 
11:02aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
11:01aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
11:01aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
11:01aNolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
11:00aGE earnings: Departing CEO Immelt’s last chance to bring good things to investors
10:59aBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
10:48aWhy ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are wise to prefer social status over money
10:44aCongress reaches deal on sweeping Russia sanctions bill
10:01aHow to earn $100,000 a year or more with side hustles 
9:59aThe dark side of cruises
9:59aStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms 
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Open in:



US Market Snapshot
Currencies
Commodities
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




12:03 PM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:00pStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms
11:52a'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut
11:27aO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
11:20aActor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71
11:07aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
11:06aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
11:03aYogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions
11:03aQualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight
11:02aPay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 
11:02aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
11:01aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
11:01aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
11:01aNolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
11:00aGE earnings: Departing CEO Immelt’s last chance to bring good things to investors
10:59aBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
10:48aWhy ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are wise to prefer social status over money
10:44aCongress reaches deal on sweeping Russia sanctions bill
10:01aHow to earn $100,000 a year or more with side hustles 
9:59aThe dark side of cruises
9:59aStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms 
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Open in:



US Market Snapshot
Currencies
Commodities
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




12:03 PM EDT
July 23, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:00pStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms
11:52a'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut
11:27aO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
11:20aActor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71
11:07aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
11:06aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
11:03aYogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions
11:03aQualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight
11:02aPay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 
11:02aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
11:01aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
11:01aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
11:01aNolan’s cinematic vision in ‘Dunkirk’ is Hollywood’s best defense against Netflix
11:00aGE earnings: Departing CEO Immelt’s last chance to bring good things to investors
10:59aBitcoin surges as miners avert split for now
10:48aWhy ‘Game of Thrones’ characters are wise to prefer social status over money
10:44aCongress reaches deal on sweeping Russia sanctions bill
10:01aHow to earn $100,000 a year or more with side hustles 
9:59aThe dark side of cruises
9:59aStocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms 
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































FLC Stock Price - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,580.07


-31.71


-0.15%











S&P 500

2,472.54


-0.91


-0.04%











Nasdaq

6,387.75


-2.25


-0.04%











GlobalDow

2,833.20


-8.47


-0.30%











Gold

1,261.10


9.00


0.72%











Oil

45.60


-1.32


-2.81%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








12:00p

Stocks brace for volatility in earnings deluge; Fed meeting looms



11:52a

Updated
'Dunkirk' storms U.S. box office with $50.5 million debut



11:27a

Updated
O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family



11:20a

Actor John Heard, ‘Home Alone’ dad, dead at 71



11:07a

Updated
Microsoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 



11:05a

Updated
Amazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say



11:02a

Updated
YogaWorks IPO pulled on valuation concerns, not market conditions



11:02a

Updated
Qualcomm’s issues go beyond Apple fight



11:02a

Updated
Pay TV expected to lose more than a million subscribers in latest quarter 



11:01a

Updated
Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


FLC


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



FLC
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateFLCAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 4:02 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
21.70



-0.54
-2.43%






Previous Close




$22.2400





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




485.7% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    132.3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 27.2K
            





Open: 21.99
Close: 21.70



21.5250
Day Low/High
21.9900





Day Range



18.4100
52 Week Low/High
22.5099


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$21.99



Day Range
21.5250 - 21.9900



52 Week Range
18.4100 - 22.5099



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
9.95M



Public Float
n/a



Beta
0.34



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
7.35%



Dividend
$0.13



Ex-Dividend Date
Jul 20, 2017



Short Interest
4.05K
06/30/17


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
27.23K




 


Performance




5 Day


-3.34%







1 Month


-2.73%







3 Month


2.12%







YTD


9.21%







1 Year


-1.72%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones











Be selective with preferred-stock ETFs and funds

May. 7, 2012 at 12:02 a.m. ET
by Jonathan Burton









Asia in broad regional advance; China Life debuts in Shanghai


Jan. 9, 2007 at 6:53 a.m. ET
by Chris Oliver













The Risks and Benefits of Buying Preferred Stock


May. 6, 2012 at 4:00 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Russia Rejects Request to Shoulder Debt


Jul. 8, 2009 at 11:28 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fletcher Criticizes Revised Bid from Peak


Mar. 2, 2001 at 4:59 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oil-Services Firms Take a Bath


Jan. 24, 2001 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Techs Support Nasdaq,
But Blue Chips Decline


Aug. 30, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Finance Sector
Extends Rally


Aug. 23, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Transocean to Buy R&B Falcon


Aug. 22, 2000 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Apache to Buy Occidental Assets


Jul. 21, 2000 at 12:48 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Dow Industrials Edge Higher
As Nasdaq Composite Tumbles


Oct. 19, 1999 at 12:27 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Shares of Oil Firms
Pump Up Portfolios


Oct. 3, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Fear of Rate Increase
Still Plagues Stocks


Aug. 10, 1999 at 12:12 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Rate Worries Hurt Stocks;
IBM, Microsoft, AOL Decline


Jul. 27, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Small-Cap Stocks
Continue Decline


Apr. 9, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Pros See a Lesson
In AT&T Deal


Mar. 22, 1999 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









EVI Weatherford to Miss Estimate


Aug. 17, 1998 at 3:25 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Blue-Chip Stocks Tumble
On Global Equity Sell-Off


Aug. 12, 1998 at 12:07 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Dow Drop Leaves
Bargains in Wake


Aug. 7, 1998 at 12:32 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oil Services


Jun. 30, 1998 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









U.S. Currency Intervention
Sends Stock Market Higher


Jun. 18, 1998 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Finnish Firm Buys U.S. Mill


Oct. 1, 1997 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste
Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

Jul. 22, 2017 at 7:30 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us
Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us

Jul. 11, 2017 at 2:11 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?
Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?

Apr. 25, 2017 at 8:31 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Is There Something To Prefer In A Preferred Stock?


Mar. 20, 2017 at 2:40 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





The John Hancock Preferred Income Fund Offers High Diversification


Feb. 21, 2017 at 11:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Feb. 7, 2017 at 8:28 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Jan. 3, 2017 at 12:03 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Dec. 10, 2016 at 7:35 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update


Nov. 13, 2016 at 6:47 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Size Adjusted


Oct. 12, 2016 at 5:13 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds


Oct. 9, 2016 at 10:43 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





NexPoint Credit Strategies Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 29, 2016 at 1:53 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Income Strategy Fund (PFL): A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 26, 2016 at 10:59 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Dynamic Credit Income Fund (PCI): A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 21, 2016 at 2:45 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Western Asset Mortgage Defined Opportunity Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 20, 2016 at 1:30 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PIMCO Strategic Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Sep. 16, 2016 at 8:57 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Preferred Stocks Become Preferred ETFs


Sep. 1, 2016 at 3:05 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





New America High Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Aug. 30, 2016 at 10:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Stone Harbor Emerging Markets Total Income Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment?


Aug. 29, 2016 at 2:17 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Clough Global Allocation Fund: A Good Or Bad Investment


Aug. 24, 2016 at 4:02 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha









DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate

Jul. 20, 2017 at 5:37 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





DFP, FFC and FLC Declare Regular Monthly Dividend Rate and DFP 
      Announces a Special Year-End Distribution


Dec. 12, 2016 at 8:02 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX








  



 
   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





KLAC

-1.78%








SBLK

-0.72%








CCXI

0.30%








DEO

-0.66%








PKI

0.09%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.












Fund Information - Fund Information













































Home
Site Map
Terms & Conditions









 
 



Mutual Funds





                Destra Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred and Income Fund











 
Closed End Funds




 
                For U.S. Investors


















 




 




   www.preferredincome.com


 
 




For Canadian Investors
















  www.bromptongroup.com




© 2014 Flaherty and Crumrine Incorporated








FLC | CEF Snapshot - Fidelity























Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 














Research >
Closed End Funds >


Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity - Terms of Use













Closed End Fund Details

Enter Name or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Performance & Risk
Portfolio Composition
Adv Chart & Technical..
News, Commentary & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Key Statistics
Distributions & Expenses
Ownership
SEC Filings


Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Performance & Risk
Portfolio Composition
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News, Commentary & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Key Statistics
Distributions & Expenses
Ownership
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Screener
Explore Research Firms
Watch List 



















Print
|
Help/Glossary




Learn about closed-end funds in the Learning Center.







Help/Glossary




Snapshot: FLC






FLAHERTY AND CRUMRINE TOTAL RETURN FUND INC
21.70-0.54 (-2.43%)  as of 4:02:01pm ET 07/21/2017

			Quotes delayed at least 15 min.
			
				
					Log in for real time quote.






Add to Watch List
Set Alert
Prospectus, Reports, Holdings & Index

Price History 

Download to CSV file
Download to Excel file


Buy Online Commission-Free. Restrictions apply.








Please note: Closed end funds are subject to the risk of their underlying assets and investment strategy. Unlike open end funds, closed end funds trade on an exchange at a price which is often a discount to their net asset value (NAV). The market price may experience periods of increased volatility due to the use of leverage as well as market and fund illiquidity. Important information you should know about investing in closed-end funds.








Bid/Size
0.00/0


Ask/Size
24.35/0


Open
21.99


High
21.99


Low
21.525


Previous CloseAS OF 07/21/2017
21.70



rcef_snapshot

Price Performance (Last 52 Wk)
-1.50%




Volume
0


Volume (90-Day Average)
28,230


NAV (Daily)
--


Bid/Ask Midpoint (Previous Day)
--




Premium / Discount (1 Month Average)^as of 06/30/2017
2.20%


NAV as of 07/20/2017
21.9


NAV Update Frequency
W+M




Options
No


Detailed Quote


































Reset Chart







Advanced Chart











Save




Save










Load Saved View
Save Current View





Note: You can save only one view at the time. Saving this view will overwrite your previously saved view.
Please use the Advanced Chart if you want to have more than one view.


Cancel 
                    







Save View



                                Your view has been saved
                            












Failed



                                Your view hasn't been saved
                            











Draw
Indicators
Events
Compare
Settings




Trendline




Notes











Splits




Earnings









Enter up to 10 symbols

DJIA
S&P 500
NASDAQ




                    tab 5
                







TODAY
2D
5D
10D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
5Y
10Y
Frequency:




DELAYED DATA AS OF
                




Text Note




Text





Font Color





















Background Color





















Font Size








Font Style























Cancel






Chart Settings




Chart Type






Show/Hide





Show Extended Hours
&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp


Show Previous Close


Cancel



















Cancel














































Please note you can display only one indicator at a time in this view. Please use Advanced Chart if you want to display more than one.

Cancel




Attention


Please note you can display only one indicator at a time in this view. Please use Advanced Chart if you want to display more than one.
Don't show again
            





















Security Type
Closed End Fund
Total Leverage Ratio 
32.57%
Asset Class
Taxable Bond
Morningstar Category 
Preferred Stock
Prospectus Objective
Income
Net Assets AS OF 06/30/2017
$217.1M
Total Expense Ratio (Reported) AS OF 11/30/2016
2.04%
Sponsor
Flaherty & Crumrine
Inception Date
08/29/2003
Financial Year-End
November 30, 2016
Benchmark Index
BofAML Pref Stck Hybrid Securty TR USD
Legal Structure
Closed End Fund
Total HoldingsAS OF 02/28/2017
121





Investment Objective Summary


It is a diversified management investment company that seeks a high current income with secondary objective of capital appreciation. It will normally invest at least 80% of its total assets in preferred securities and other income-producing securities so, that at least 50% of its total assets are invested in preferred securities. At least 80% of the preferred securities and debt securities are investment grade quality. Up to 20% may be invested in securities rated below investment grade, provided the issuer has investment grade senior debt outstanding. Normally it will invest 25% or more of its total assets in each of the utilities industry and the banking industry. Investment strategies such as hedging will be used in order to increase income. The Fund will issue Preferred Stock.
						Learn More
						
News, Commentary & EventsLog in for more news


News




DFP, FFC and FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
Business Wire - 








	
	
		07/20/2017
	



										The Boards of Directors of Flaherty & Crumrine Dynamic Preferred and Income Fund Incorporated, Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Securities Income Fund Incorporated  and Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated (FLC) today announced new regular monthly dividends beginning in August 2017.
									





PFD and PFO Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate
Business Wire - 








	
	
		07/20/2017
	



										The Boards of Directors of Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Income Fund Incorporated  and Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Income Opportunity Fund Incorporated today announced new regular monthly dividends beginning in August 2017. The regular monthly dividend rate for PFD will be $0.082 per share, which equates to an annual dividend of $0.984 per share.
									






Commentary
Sorry : There is currently no commentary available for this symbol.





More News, Commentary & Events

Analyst Opinions


Analyst Ratings




LAST CHANGE



Firm Name
As of Date
Action
Rating
Report


Morningstar, Inc.*
05/31/2014
Downgrade
Overall - 15 Large Growth funds ratedDetails

				--
			








Overall Rating

4 out of 5 stars

							Morningstar has awarded this fund 4 stars based on its risk-adjusted performance compared to the 15 funds within its Morningstar Preferred Stock Category.
						


How is it determined?

							A fund's Overall Morningstar Rating (TM) is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. Please see the ratings tab for more information about methodology.
						



3 Yr.

Out of 15 funds


5 Yr.

Out of 11 funds


10 Yr.

Out of 9 funds





What does it mean?

							A fund's Morningstar Rating is a quantitative assessment of a fund's past performance that accounts for both risk and return, with funds earning between 1 and 5 stars. As always, this rating system is designed to be used as a first step in the fund evaluation process. A high rating alone is not sufficient basis upon which to make an investment decision.
						




More Analyst Opinions

Key Statistics




Bond Holdings Valuation AS OF 02/28/2017








Average Duration 
--


Average Maturity 
--


Average Coupon % 
7.72%




Distributions as of 07/21/2017




Total Distribution Rate (Market Price) 
7.18%


Total Distribution Rate (NAV) 
7.29%




Leverage as of --




Total Leverage Ratio 
32.57%


1940 Act Leverage Ratio 
32.62%


Non-1940 Act Leverage Ratio 
0.00%



See all Key Stats

Compare





FLCFLAHERTY AND CRUMRINE TOTAL RETURN FUND INC
Asset Class Median


Market CapitalizationAS OF 02/28/2017
310.7M
513.6M


Volume (10-Day Avg)AS OF 07/20/2017
38.0K
68.0M


YTD Market Price Total ReturnAS OF 06/30/2017
+16.55%
+6.95%


1 Month Market Price Total ReturnAS OF 06/30/2017
+1.62%
+0.32%


1 Year Market Price Total ReturnAS OF 06/30/2017
+9.99%
+13.80%


1 Year NAV Total ReturnAS OF 06/30/2017
+15.56%
+12.70%


3 Year Annualized Market Price Total ReturnAS OF 06/30/2017
+12.30%
+13.80%


Beta (Market Price 1 Yr)AS OF 06/30/2017
2.03
0.80


Annual Turnover RatioAS OF 11/30/2016
14.00%
45.00%


Total Expense Ratio (Reported) AS OF 11/30/2016
0.00%
1.45%


Total Expense Ratio (Adjusted) AS OF 11/30/2016
1.30%
1.21%


Compare to Other CEFs



Performance


Premium / Discount to NAV^ as of 06/30/2017
Chart|Values
Chart|Values


Date
Average


06/2017
2.20%


05/2017
2.56%


04/2017
0.94%


03/2017
1.83%


02/2017
-1.44%


01/2017
2.50%


12/2016
-0.45%


11/2016
1.31%


10/2016
0.34%


09/2016
0.53%


08/2016
3.94%


07/2016
3.89%




Quarter-End Average Annual Total ReturnsAS OF 06/30/2017


NAV Return
Market Return


1 Year
+15.56%
+9.99%


3 Year
+9.70%
+12.30%


5 Year
+11.96%
+11.76%


10 Year
+9.36%
+11.09%


Life
+8.24%
+8.59%


			Life as of inception date: 08/29/2003      
			Gross Expense Ratio: 0.00
		The performance data featured represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate; therefore, you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance data quoted.
		
More about Performance & Risk

Portfolio CompositionReported by Fund Sponsor




Top 10 HoldingsAs of 02/28/2017




PNC/PP
Pnc Finl Svcs Grp Pfd
3.79%


FITBI
Fifth Third Bancorp Pfd
3.46%



Enbridge Engy Partners L P FRN
2.99%



Axis Capital Holdings Ltd
2.77%



Bnp Paribas 144A FRN
2.57%



Metlife 144A FRN
2.39%



Jpmorgan Chase FRN
2.35%


GAPWP
Georgia Pwr Pfd
2.34%



Metlife FRN
2.07%


C/PK
Citigroup Pfd
1.99%


Assets in Top 10 Holdings26.71%




					Credit Quality
					† AS OF --





Type
% Bonds


AAA
--


AA
--


A
--


BBB
--


BB
--


B
--


Below B
--


Not Rated
--







					Maturity
					 AS OF 02/28/2017






% Bonds


10 to 15 Years
3.30


15 to 20 Years
2.27


1 to 3 Years
0.00


20 to 30 Years
13.66


3 to 5 Years
0.00


5 to 7 Years
0.00


7 to 10 Years
1.55


Over 30 Years
79.21




More about Portfolio Composition








*The Overall Morningstar RatingTM for a fund is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and ten-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. For each fund with at least a three-year history, Morningstar calculates a Morningstar Rating based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a funds monthly performance (including the effects of sales charges, loads and redemption fees, if applicable), placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of funds in each category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. (Each share class is counted as a fraction of one fund within this scale and rated separately, which may cause slight variations in the distribution percentages.)The performance data shown represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance data quoted. Distributions are not guaranteed and the amount of distributions will vary depending on a number of factors. Market prices and investment return will vary, therefore you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares. Click on the "Performance & Risk" link to view quarter-end performance. All performance data is for the common shares of the fund. Total distribution rate (at market or NAV) may include unknown combinations of income, capital gains and return of capital.Cumulative total returns are reported as of the period indicated. Life of fund figures are reported as of the commencement date to the period indicated. ^Premium/Discount to NAV represents the percentage by which the funds market price exceeds or is less than net asset value (NAV). Shares of closed-end funds frequently trade at a market price that is a discount to their NAV.Top holdings are as of the date indicated and may not be representative of the funds current or future investments. News, commentary and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.Any data, charts and other information provided on this page are intended to help self-directed investors evaluate closed end funds. Criteria and inputs entered, including the choice to make closed end fund comparisons, are at the sole discretion of the user and are solely for the convenience of the user. Analyst opinions, ratings and reports are provided by third-parties unaffiliated with Fidelity. All information supplied or obtained from this page is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell a particular security, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating closed end funds. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use. Determine which securities are right for you based on your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors and re-evaluate them on a periodic basis.© 2011 Morningstar, Inc. All rights reserved. The Morningstar information contained herein (1) is proprietary to Morningstar or its affiliates; (2) may not be copied or redistributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete, or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information.Before investing in any fund, you should consider its investment objective, risks, charges and expenses. Contact Fidelity for the most recent shareholder report for this information. Read it carefully.  Please also review information provided by the fund on its web site.  







© 1998－2017 FMR LLC.
All rights reserved.


Terms of Use
Privacy
Security
Site Map
























Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund - NYSE:FLC - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund (FLC)
Follow




                                    21.70
                                

0.54
2.43




                        NYSE : Financial
                    

Jul 21, 2017 4:02 PM EDT












Prev Close
  22.24


Open
21.96


Day Low/High

                                    21.52 /
                                    21.99


52 Wk Low/High

                                    18.41 /
                                    22.51
                                


Volume
132.28K


Avg Volume 
25.80K











Exchange
NYSE


Shares Outstanding
9.96M


Market Cap
221.47M


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            11.46
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            1.60
                                            (7.20%)

                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News









DFP, FFC And FLC Announce New Regular Monthly Dividend Rate






Reminder - Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund (FLC) Goes Ex-Dividend Soon













FLC Ex-Dividend Reminder - 5/19/17
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 5/19/17, Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated will trade ex-dividend, for its monthly dividend of $0.133, payable on 5/31/17. As a percentage of FLC's recent stock price of $21.46, this dividend works out to approximately 0.62%, so look for shares of Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated to trade 0.62% lower — all else being equal — when FLC shares open for trading on 5/19/17.

May 17, 2017 10:00 AM EDT













DFP, FFC And FLC Declare Regular Monthly Dividend Rate And DFP Announces A Special Year-End Distribution
The Boards of Directors of Flaherty & Crumrine Dynamic Preferred and Income Fund Incorporated ( NYSE: DFP), Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Securities Income Fund Incorporated (NYSE: FFC) and Flaherty &...

Dec 12, 2016 8:02 PM EST













Dividend Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FLC, HIO, GOOD
FLC HIO GOOD are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, July 20, 2016

Jul 19, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Wednesday: PFO, FLC, HYI
PFO FLC HYI are going ex-dividend Wednesday, Wednesday, April 20, 2016

Apr 19, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Monday: PFO, FLC, DFP
PFO FLC DFP are going ex-dividend Monday, Monday, March 21, 2016

Mar 18, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FLC, EFR, BGB
FLC EFR BGB are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Thursday, February 18, 2016

Feb 17, 2016 10:00 AM EST













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FLC, DMO, ESD
FLC DMO ESD are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, January 20, 2016

Jan 19, 2016 10:00 AM EST













3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Monday: FLC, DFP, ETG
FLC DFP ETG are going ex-dividend Monday, Monday, December 21, 2015

Dec 18, 2015 10:00 AM EST













Tomorrow's Ex-Dividends To Watch: HCAP, FLC, HIX
HCAP FLC HIX are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, November 18, 2015

Nov 17, 2015 10:00 AM EST













Flaherty & Crumrine Announces Donald Crumrine's Retirement As Portfolio Manager
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated today announces that Donald F.

Nov 13, 2015 5:22 PM EST













Dividend Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: TLI, FLC, HYI
TLI FLC HYI are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, October 21, 2015

Oct 20, 2015 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Monday: PFD, FLC, DFP
PFD FLC DFP are going ex-dividend Monday, Monday, September 21, 2015

Sep 18, 2015 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FCO, FLC, PPT
FCO FLC PPT are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Thursday, August 20, 2015

Aug 19, 2015 10:00 AM EDT













Dividend Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: EFF, FLC, GAIN
EFF FLC GAIN are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, July 22, 2015

Jul 21, 2015 10:04 AM EDT













Ex-Dividends To Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: PFD, FLC, EFT
PFD FLC EFT are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Friday, June 19, 2015

Jun 18, 2015 10:02 AM EDT













Flaherty & Crumrine Announces Robert Ettinger's Retirement As Portfolio Manager
Flaherty & Crumrine Incorporated today announces that Robert M.

Jun 4, 2015 9:15 AM EDT













DFP, FFC And FLC Announce Results Of Annual Election Of Officers
The Boards of Directors of Flaherty & Crumrine Dynamic Preferred and Income Fund Incorporated ( NYSE: DFP), Flaherty & Crumrine Preferred Securities Income Fund Incorporated (NYSE: FFC) and Flaherty &...

Apr 21, 2015 6:02 PM EDT













3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: PFD, FLC, BSL
PFD FLC BSL are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Tuesday, April 21, 2015

Apr 20, 2015 10:17 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FEO, FLC, BSL
FEO FLC BSL are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Friday, March 20, 2015

Mar 19, 2015 10:00 AM EDT













Tomorrow's Ex-Dividends To Watch: FLC, BWG, CTR
FLC BWG CTR are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, February 18, 2015

Feb 17, 2015 10:14 AM EST













3 Stocks With Upcoming Ex-Dividend Dates: FLC, DFP, HIX
FLC DFP HIX are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, January 21, 2015

Jan 20, 2015 10:03 AM EST













Friday's Ex-Dividends To Watch: FLC, FOF, MIE
FLC FOF MIE are going ex-dividend Friday, Friday, December 19, 2014

Dec 18, 2014 10:00 AM EST













Ex-Div Reminder For Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated (FLC)
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 12/19/14, Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated will trade ex-dividend, for its monthly dividend of $0.136, payable on 12/31/14. As a percentage of FLC's recent stock price of $20.38, this dividend works out to approximately 0.67%, so look for shares of Flaherty & Crumrine Total Return Fund Incorporated to trade 0.67% lower — all else being equal — when FLC shares open for trading on 12/19/14.

Dec 17, 2014 10:17 AM EST













Ex-Dividends To Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: KST, FLC, AWP
KST FLC AWP are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Tuesday, November 18, 2014

Nov 17, 2014 10:00 AM EST













3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FLC, EHI, FFC
FLC EHI FFC are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, October 22, 2014

Oct 21, 2014 10:02 AM EDT













Friday's Ex-Dividends To Watch: FLC, ETB, EIM
FLC ETB EIM are going ex-dividend Friday, Friday, September 19, 2014

Sep 18, 2014 10:00 AM EDT













Dividend Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: FLC, EOI, ETV
FLC EOI ETV are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Wednesday, August 20, 2014

Aug 19, 2014 10:05 AM EDT













3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: PFO, FLC, PMO
PFO FLC PMO are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Tuesday, July 22, 2014, 4:00 AM ET

Jul 21, 2014 10:00 AM EDT



















Next






Load More








From Our Partners



Value And Income: It's A Matter Of Taste

SeekingAlpha



Flaherty & Crumrine Cut Distributions On Preferred Stock CEFs: What Should An Income Investor Do?

SeekingAlpha



Flaherty&Crumrine/Claymore Total Return Fund declares $0.126 dividend

SeekingAlpha



Arbitrage Exists! Review Of Our Best Strategies Posted On SA And An Invitation To Join Us

SeekingAlpha



Is A Bubble Brewing In Income Assets?

SeekingAlpha



Is There Something To Prefer In A Preferred Stock?

SeekingAlpha



The John Hancock Preferred Income Fund Offers High Diversification

SeekingAlpha



REIT preferred ETF opens for business

SeekingAlpha



Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

SeekingAlpha



Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

SeekingAlpha



Flaherty&Crumrine/Claymore Total Return Fund declares $0.133 dividend

SeekingAlpha



Dow Direction Dictates

SeekingAlpha



Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

SeekingAlpha



Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Monthly Update

SeekingAlpha



Comparing And Contrasting Price Share Performance Of Recently Reviewed Funds: Size Adjusted

SeekingAlpha


































 











Trending


Trump Just Resurrected the Ugly Practice Known as Civil Forfeiture for No Reason


3 Things Tesla Doesn't Want to Admit


T-Mobile Reveals Promo Discounting Apple's iPhone 7 -- Here's How Much You'll Pay


GM May Slash Six Car Models to Combat Slumping Sales, Avoid Plant Layoffs


Don't Sleep on General Electric's Cheap Stock Price











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Total Return Fund (PTTFX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Total Return Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size






Ticker Symbol:


			
				PTTFX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/21/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$10.15
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.01
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/21/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								3.87%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$9.85
							
							-
							
								$10.16
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$31.50

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 05/31/2017



Overall

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


3 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


5 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						


10 Year

							
								
								
									N/A

								
							
						




				Morningstar rated the Total Return Fund among 
N/A,
N/A,
N/A
and 
N/A
Intermediate-Term Bond
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 05/31/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to maximize total return through income and capital appreciation.
		
30-Day Yield2 



Annualized Dividend
							
								as of 
								 
									(07/21/2017)
								
							



						
						
							2.87%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/ Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							2.63%
						
					



SEC Standardized w/o Waiver
							
								as of
								
									(06/30/2017)
								
							



						
							1.07%
						
					


Average Annual Total Returns 3



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


3 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


5 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


10 Years

				
					N/A
				
			

				
					N/A
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
						2.68% 
						


				
					
						2.68%
						



Inception Date

						
							November 15, 2016
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.72%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.57%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						Contractual
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
					
						
							September 30, 2018
						
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, yield and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   
			



2 The 30-day dividend yield represents the average daily dividends for the 
30-day period, annualized and divided by the net asset values per share 
at the end of the period; it is available the first quarter after the 
fund's inception.  The SEC standardized yield is computed under an SEC 
standardized formula and reflects an estimated yield to maturity 
(assuming all portfolio securities are held to maturity); it is 
available the first month after the fund's inception.  
			

3
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©Sun Jul 23 04:49:19 EDT 2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services | T. Rowe Price





















 










>
	




Home
Mutual Funds, Retirement and Investment Services












Introducing T. Rowe Price® 
ActivePlus Portfolios.
Save time with a diversified portfolio-powered by our experts.



		                    Get Started
		                    
		                












My Account   





Remember User Name

Log In

Log In



Forgot user name


Register for online access 




Open an Account






















Mutual Funds









We offer over 120 no-load mutual funds to address your specific investing needs.











                        See All Mutual Funds
                    

















Rollover IRAs









Changing jobs or planning for retirement? Our specialists make rolling over your 401(k) account easy.











                        Learn More
                    

















IRA









Plan for retirement with the help of a Roth IRA or Traditional IRA.











                        Learn More
                    

















            
                
                    
                    See all Products and Services
                    
                         


















Find low-cost mutual funds to help you achieve your financial goals.












Search Mutual Funds
























129







No-Load Mutual Funds
Providing a broad set of opportunities



















Historical Performance





Daily Prices





Download a Prospectus
















Mutual Fund Categories





We offer a full range of investment strategies across multiple asset classes, capitalizations, sectors, and styles.







Fund Type
Number Available
Stock Funds
54
Asset Allocation Funds
34
Money Market Funds
8
Target Date Funds
26
Bond Funds
36






















            
                
                    
                    See all Mutual Funds
                    
                         


















Over 80% of our mutual funds beat their 10-year Lipper average as of 3/31/17*











            
                
                    
                    Learn More
                    
                         















T. Rowe Price Insights®





Access our latest investment thinking, information on retirement planning, and perspectives on the markets.







Asset Allocation





An Inside Look at T. Rowe Price® ActivePlus Portfolios

July 13, 2017









Retirement Planning





6 Key Ingredients for Retirement Planning

July 10, 2017









Markets & Economy





Quarterly Market Review

June 30, 2017













            
                
                    
                    See all Articles
                    
                         




















Ready to Get Started?







                        Open an Account
                    










Or Call 1-888-285-2612





















View firm's background on FINRA's BrokerCheck
T. Rowe Price mutual funds are subject to ongoing management fees and may be subject to redemption fees. An IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when an IRA is closed. See prospectus for details.

The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
*144 of our 330 mutual funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes and excludes funds used in insurance products). 122 of these 144 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 204 of 311 (66%), 175 of 213, 140 of 178 (79%), of T. Rowe Price funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
24 of our 39 Retirement Funds had a 10-year track record as of 3/31/17 (includes all share classes). 23 of these 24 funds beat their Lipper averages for the 10-year period. 38 of 39, 35 of 36, and 35 of 36 of the Retirement Funds outperformed their Lipper average for the 1-, 3-, and 5-year periods ended 3/31/17, respectively. Calculations are based on cumulative total return. Not all funds outperformed for all periods. (Source for data: Lipper Inc.)
Source: Lipper Inc. 168 of 213 funds (excluding institutional and bank institutional funds as defined by Lipper) more than 6 months old had expense ratios below their Lipper averages based on fiscal year-end data available as of 3/31/17.
The principal value of the Retirement Funds is not guaranteed at any time, including at or after the target date, which is the approximate year an investor plans to retire (assumed to be age 65) and likely stop making new investments in the fund. If an investor plans to retire significantly earlier or later than age 65, the funds may not be an appropriate investment even if the investor is retiring on or near the target date. The funds’ allocations among a broad range of underlying T. Rowe Price stock and bond funds will change over time. The funds emphasize potential capital appreciation during the early phases of retirement asset accumulation, balance the need for appreciation with the need for income as retirement approaches, and focus on supporting an income stream over a long-term postretirement withdrawal horizon. The funds are not designed for a lump-sum redemption at the target date and do not guarantee a particular level of income. The funds maintain a substantial allocation to equities both prior to and after the target date, which can result in greater volatility over shorter time horizons.















x


You are using an unsupported browser version that might prevent you from accessing certain features on our site.
 
We suggest clicking an icon below to download a supported browser version.
 
 

Google Chrome
Mozilla Firefox
Internet Explorer
Safari














404 Page Not Found















Page Not Found




We apologize for any inconvenience, but we are unable to locate the page you requested. 
                                This could be due to either of the reasons below: 


                                    If you manually entered the URL, please make sure it is correct. 
                                    Check that the capitalization matches, that all words are spelled correctly, 
                                    and that all the punctuation, like periods (.) and slashes (/) are correctly placed. 
                                    Be sure that you are using the forward slash (/) and not the backward slash (\). 
                                    Remember, there are no spaces in URLs.
                                

                                    If you have bookmarked this page, this page may have been renamed, moved, or deleted. 
                                    Please return to our homepage, and reset your bookmarks.
                                





















JPMorgan Total Return Fund - A - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar



JPMorgan Total Return Fund(JMTAX)A CIR2R5R6  Compare Funds 

Hypothetical Tool 




OverviewPerformanceFees & MinimumsPortfolioManagementDocuments 



	As of April 3, 2017, this fund's Select share class has been renamed to I. Please see the prospectus for more details.
  




Designed ToDesigned to deliver high total return through investing in a wide range of debt securities.ApproachUtilizes a dynamic approach that combines traditional fixed income with opportunistic investingEmploys a top-down, macro-driven approach to help mitigate risks of benchmark-constrained strategiesSelects investments by analyzing the performance potential of individual securities and different market sectors










Overview widget loading ...







Performance
Performance widget loading ...



Fees and Minimums
Fees widget loading ...


Portfolio
Portfolio widget loading ...							
							


Management
Fund Managers 












 William  Eigen Portfolio Manager

Load More 



Documents 
Fund Literature

 

Fact Sheet: Total Return (A)




Commentary: Total Return







Load More 


 
Supplemental Information

 

Uncertified Portfolio Holdings - Total Return Fund




Supplemental Data Sheet - Total Return Fund


Building stronger fixed income portfolios



Sales Charge / Dealer Concession Schedule




2016 JPMorgan Funds Capital Gains Distribution




Quarterly Certified Holdings - JPMorgan Total Return Fund







Load More 



 
Regulatory Documents

 

Summary Prospectus




Prospectus




Annual Report




Semi Annual Report




Statement of Additional Information







Load More 




Disclaimer1Please refer to the prospectus for additional information about cut-off times. Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The Fund's adviser and/or its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend and interest expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation and extraordinary expenses) exceed 0.66% for A Shares, 1.31% for C Shares, 0.56% for I Shares, 1.16% for R2 Shares, 0.46% for R5 Shares and 0.41% for R6 Shares of the average daily net assets. The Fund may invest in one or more money market funds advised by the adviser or its affiliates (affiliated money market funds). The Fund's adviser has contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses in an amount sufficient to offset the fees and expenses of the affiliated money market funds incurred by the Fund because of the Fund's investment in such money market funds. This waiver is in effect through 6/30/2017 for A Shares, 6/30/2017 for C Shares, 6/30/2017 for I Shares, 6/30/2017 for R2 Shares, 6/30/2017 for R5 Shares and 6/30/2017 for R6 Shares, at which time the adviser and/or its affiliates will determine whether to renew or revise it. The difference between net and gross fees includes all applicable fee waivers and expense reimbursements. The quoted performance of the Fund includes performance of a predecessor fund/share class prior to the Fund's commencement of operations. Please refer to the current prospectus for further information.  Mutual funds have fees that reduce their performance: indexes do not. You cannot invest directly in an index. The Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index is an unmanaged index representing SEC-registered taxable and dollar denominated securities. It covers the U.S. investment grade fixed rate bond market, with index components for government and corporate securities, mortgage pass-through, and asset-backed securities. The performance of the Lipper Core Plus Bond Funds Index includes expenses associated with a mutual fund, such as investment management fees. These expenses are not identical to the expenses charged by the Fund. Total return figures (for the fund and any index quoted) assume payment of fees and reinvestment of dividends (after the highest applicable foreign withholding tax) and distributions. Without fee waivers, fund returns would have been lower. Due to rounding, some values may not total 100%. Â©2017, American Bankers Association, CUSIP Database provided by the Standard & Poor's CUSIP Service Bureau, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. All rights reserved.The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at least a three-year history. Exchange traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10- year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is included in all three rating periods.Rankings do not take sales loads into account.The following risks could cause the fund to lose money or perform more poorly than other investments. For more complete risk information, see the prospectus. The value of investments in mortgage-related and asset-backed securities will be influenced by the factors affecting the housing market and the assets underlying such securities. The securities may decline in value, face valuation difficulties, become more volatile and/or become illiquid. They are also subject to prepayment risk, which occurs when mortgage holders refinance or otherwise repay their loans sooner than expected, creating an early return of principal to holders of the loans. The Fund may use futures contracts, swaps, and derivatives in connection with its investment strategies. Derivatives are subject to the risk that changes in the value of a derivative may not correlate perfectly with the underlying asset, rate or index.Total return assumes reinvestment of income. The top 10 holdings listed reflect only the Fund's long-term investments. Short-term investments are excluded. Holdings are subject to change. The holdings listed should not be considered recommendations to purchase or sell a particular security. Each individual security is calculated as a percentage of the aggregate market value of the securities held in the Fund and does not include the use of derivative positions, where applicable. Duration: Measures price sensitivity of fixed income securities to interest rate changes. Average Life: The length of time the principal of a debt issue is expected to be outstanding.
















Fixed Income - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Fixed Income
			




Build stronger fixed income portfolios

	We have built and innovated our fixed income capabilities with just one aim: build stronger portfolios to solve our clients’ needs. Today we are one of the top fixed income managers in the world.
Download the framework


Diverse perspectives, integrated solutions 

Research Driven
Access the power of a globally integrated team of investment professionals and our proprietary research, encompassing fundamental, quantitative and technical analysis.


Actionable Insights
Benefit from actionable insights designed to help you invest with conviction, from our regular macro and market views, to our fixed income portfolio construction tools.
 

Outcome Oriented
Choose from a wide variety of outcome-oriented solutions designed to address all your fixed income needs.


Demonstrated Results
Tap into the proven success of one of the world’s largest fixed income managers, with broad experience gained across regions and market cycles.



Featured Fixed Income Funds


 


“Rather than try to outguess the market, investors should seek to craft an all-weather bond portfolio, one that delivers the benefits of fixed income in a variety of scenarios.”
PRISCILLA HANCOCK, GLOBAL FIXED INCOME STRATEGIST 






BUILDING STRONGER FIXED INCOME PORTFOLIOS


Download the framework >






Fixed income funds
                         


View All Taxable Fixed Income Funds   
View All Tax Exempt Fixed Income Funds  




Other Asset Classes
                         


Equity Funds  
Multi-Asset Solutions  
Alternatives Funds  
Money Market Funds  






Investments in bonds and other debt securities will change in value based on changes in interest rates. If rates rise, the value of these investments generally drops.
 
Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Principle #1: Plan on Living a Long Time - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar








PRINCIPLE #1: PLAN ON LIVING A LONG TIME

DON’T LET YOUR CLIENTS' MONEY RUN OUT

Your clients are living longer, and many of them haven't saved enough. Use our Principles for Successful Long-Term Investing to talk to them about this reality, and to help them be prepared.
ACCESS ALL 7 PRINCIPLES







 














We are living longer

Thanks to advances in medicine and healthier lifestyles, people who are 65 today have a very good chance of reaching ages 80 or 90. A 65-year-old couple might be surprised to learn that at least one of them has a 48% probability of living another 25 years and needing investments to last until age 90.

	 

Many of us have not saved enough

Studies reveal that individuals do not feel adequately prepared for retirement. Investors should start early by saving more, investing with discipline and having a plan for their future.

	 

	 

Explore More Principles

Learn more about successful long-term investing
   NEXT PRINCIPLE   >   






4 STRATEGIES FOR LONG-TERM INVESTORS

We offer investment strategies covering all asset classes for diversification and risk management to help you and your clients build stronger portfolios.
ACCESS 4 HIGH CONVICTION FUNDS



Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss. Diversification among investment options and asset classes may help to reduce overall volatility.

















Guide to the Markets - J.P. Morgan Asset Management






For the best experience on this page, please enable JavaScript in your browser.
Need to know how to enable it? Go here.









CLOSE



My Collections


My ProfileContact Us



Skip to main content













Input search bar




				Guide to the Markets
			



Guide to the Markets
                         


	The Guide illustrates a comprehensive array of market and economic histories, trends and statistics through clear, compelling charts and graphs you can share with your clients.


LAUNCH THE VIEWER


Download the 3Q 2017 Guide to the Markets






Economic & Market Update
Watch Dr. David Kelly’s quarterly presentation using slides from the Guide to the Markets.Continue reading  


On the Bench
Need more Guide to the Markets? Access an additional collection of Guide to the Markets slides, updated on a quarterly basis.Continue reading  


Investing Principles
The Principles for successful long-term investing presentation uses select slides from the Guide to the Markets to explain seven key investment principles that financial professionals can use with their clients. Continue reading  


 Introducing the Guide to the Markets for the third quarter of 2017July 3, 2017Dr. David Kelly, Chief Global Strategist, J.P. Morgan Funds, previews this quarter's themes and invites you to subscribe to the Guide to the Markets. 


 

Quarterly Perspectives





                            Often referred to as the 'guide to the Guide', Quarterly Perspectives provides insightful stories and quarterly themes using slides from the Guide to the Markets. 
                            
View Quarterly Perspectives



Portfolio Discussions





                            Focusing on different asset classes or regions, Portfolio Discussions help to frame investment conversations using slides from Guide to the Markets. 
                            

View Portfolio Discussions





Insights

					Market Insights

					Portfolio Insights

					Retirement Insights


The J. P. Morgan Insights app 

A new way for financial advisors to access and customize J.P. Morgan intellectual capital
                         

                            Get the Insights app:
                            


           
              



Learn more about the Insights App











Past performance is no guarantee of future results. Diversification does not guarantee investment returns and does not eliminate the risk of loss.
Bonds are subject to interest rate risks. Bond prices generally fall when interest rates rise.
The price of equity securities may rise or fall because of changes in the broad market or changes in a company's financial condition, sometimes rapidly or unpredictably. Equity securities are subject to "stock market risk" meaning that stock prices in general may decline over short or extended periods of time.
International investing involves a greater degree of risk and increased volatility. Changes in currency exchange rates and differences in accounting and taxation policies outside the U.S. can raise or lower returns. Also, some overseas markets may not be as politically and economically stable as the United States and other nations. Investments in emerging markets can be more volatile.
Real estate investments may be subject to a higher degree of market risk because of concentration in a specific industry, sector or geographical sector. Real estate investments may be subject to risks including, but not limited to, declines in the value of real estate, risks related to general and economic conditions, changes in the value of the underlying property owned by the trust and defaults by borrower.
Investments in commodities may have greater volatility than investments in traditional securities, particularly if the instruments involve leverage. The value of commodity-linked derivative instruments may be affected by changes in overall market movements, commodity index volatility, changes in interest rates, or factors affecting a particular industry or commodity, such as drought, floods, weather, livestock disease, embargoes, tariffs and international economic, political and regulatory developments. Use of leveraged commodity-linked derivatives creates an opportunity for increased return but, at the same time, creates the possibility for greater loss. 
Derivatives may be riskier than other types of investments because they may be more sensitive to changes in economic or market conditions than other types of investments and could result in losses that significantly exceed the original investment. The use of derivatives may not be successful, resulting in investment losses, and the cost of such strategies may reduce investment returns.
There is no guarantee that the use of long and short positions will succeed in limiting an investor's exposure to domestic stock market movements, capitalization, sector swings or other risk factors. Investing using long and short selling strategies may have higher portfolio turnover rates. Short selling involves certain risks, including additional costs associated with covering short positions and a possibility of unlimited loss on certain short sale positions.
JPMorgan Chase & Co. and its affiliates do not provide tax advice. Accordingly, any discussion of U.S. tax matters contained herein (including any attachments) is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, in connection with the promotion, marketing or recommendation by anyone unaffiliated with JPMorgan Chase & Co. of any of the matters addressed herein or for the purpose of avoiding U.S. tax-related penalties. 




